<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88914-0003 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-14-88.f2.A1002</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">FARM CREDIT ADMINISTRATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 614, 615 and 618 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Loan Policies and Operations; Funding and Fiscal Affairs, Loan Policiesand Operations, and Funding Operations; General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Farm Credit Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:. </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Farm Credit Administration (FCA) by action of theFarm Credit Administration Board (Board) adopts and publishes final regulationson borrower rights implementing changes brought about by the AgriculturalCredit Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-233) (1987 Act) enacted on January 6, 1988,which amended provisions of the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (the Act). Theborrower rights include, among others, procedures for the restructuringof loans from certain Farm Credit System (System) institutions and other``qualified lenders,'' which have become ``distressed loans'' as thoseterms are defined in the Act; protection for certain borrower stock; certainprotections for borrowers who have met all loan obligations; cooperationby System institutions with certified State agricultural loan mediationprograms; and a right of first refusal with respect to the sale or leaseof certain acquired property of the institutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>The regulations shall become effective upon theexpiration of 30 days after this publication during which either or bothhouses of Congress are in session. Notice of effective date will be published.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Andrea J. Cali, Senior Attorney,Office of General Counsel, Farm Credit Administration, McLean, VA 22102-5090,(703) 883-4020, TDD (703) 883-4444.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On May 12, 1988, the FCA publisheda proposed rule with request for comments (53 FR 16937) to implement thechanges in borrower rights that the legislation enacted. In particular,the statute directed System institutions which are ``qualified lenders''to develop policies governing the restructuring of ``distressed loans'',as those terms are defined in the Act, and to submit such policies to FCA.Other revised provisions specify the review available to applicants and/orborrowers who are denied credit or restructuring of their loans, provideprotection for borrower stock and voluntary or involuntary advance paymentaccounts, set forth procedures to be used in informing borrowers aboutqualifying for differential interest rate programs, establish certain protectionsfor borrowers who have met all loan obligations, and provide a right offirst refusal to certain borrowers to repurchase or lease certain propertyacquired by System institutions through foreclosure or voluntary conveyance.In addition, System institutions are to cooperate in good faith with requestsfor information or analysis of information made in the course of mediationunder any State agricultural loan mediation program certified by the Secretaryof Agriculture in accordance with section 501 of the 1987 Act. A public hearing was held on June 8, 1988, and the comment period closedon June 13, 1988. The FCA received 303 comments on the proposed regulations,with some individuals or groups submitting more than one comment letter.Comments were received from the Farm Credit Corporation of America (FCCA)on behalf of its 37-member banks. Additional comments were received fromSystem institutions, numerous individuals, groups representing farmers,legal aid organizations or attorneys, members of Congress, four attorneysgeneral from midwestern States, and other groups. All comments submittedhave been considered in drafting the final regulations which are publishedherein. Comments on sections of the Act concerning areas other than borrowerrights, or other written material submitted not commenting on the proposedregulations have not been addressed. Except for the general comments addresseddirectly below, any changes to the proposed regulations including any commentsreceived on the subject matter are explained below by section within theaffected part of 12 CFR. Where commenters addressed issues in one sectionthat FCA felt more appropriately should be discussed in another section,FCA responded to those comments in the section(s) that more appropriatelydealt with the issue. If a section number is not referenced, no commentswere received. <ITAG tagnum="84">Response to Comments </ITAG>General Comments Many comments were received concerning the direct and indirect costs tothe System created by borrower rights. Some System institutions, as wellas one individual farmer expressed concern that ``good'' borrowers or viablefarmers are in effect paying for costs incurred on behalf of ``bad'' ordistressed borrowers. There was concern over the potential for abuse ofthe provisions because of the costs and delays created by borrower rights,as well as by any overlap these rights may have with bankruptcy and Statedebtor protection laws. FCA recognizes that there are direct and indirectcosts involved and the potential for abuse. However, FCA also recognizesthe need for effective implementation of borrower rights. Thus, throughoutthe regulations, FCA has balanced all of these concerns by implementingthe statute as fully and fairly as possible such that all borrowers whoare entitled to such rights are protected and afforded their rights withoutunnecessary costs to the lenders, the System, and all member borrowers.Comments expressed concern about the perceived inconsistent implementationof borrower rights throughout the System. Specifically, commenters requestedFCA require that restructuring policies developed under andSection; 614.4515be uniform and the content of those policies be dictated by FCA. Also,one comment requested that detailed policies regarding first refusal rightsbe established. In response to those general comments that FCA should requireuniformity in the manner in which all lenders implement borrower rights,to the extent that FCA has adopted final regulations that require qualifiedlenders to afford borrowers their rights as set out in the statute, thereis uniformity. However, FCA sees no need to require each and every qualifiedlender to carry out each aspect of the borrower rights provisions in thesame manner such that FCA is in effect making every day business judgmentdecisions for the lenders. FCA will not substitute itself for the functionsthat are to be performed by qualified lenders' management and boards ofdirectors by prescribing every detail of a lender's policies. FCA will,of course, continue to examine the institutions' compliance with thesestatutory and regulatory criteria. Farm groups and individuals commented that FCA merely restates the Actin the regulations without providing for more specific guidance. FCA disagreeswith this comment in that the borrower rights provisions in the statuteoffer specific guidelines, and where they do not, the final regulationsaddress these issues. One group commented that FCA merely restates theAct, and thus fails to direct lenders to comply with the statute. However,no such express direction is required, as failure to comply with the statutewould be a violation of law. Where the regulations follow the Act, lendersmust comply with requirements that are set out not only in the Act, butin the regulations as well. One individual recommended that a statement of purpose and responsibilityof the System be included in the regulations. One commenter further suggestedthat the regulations state that the main objectives of the Act are to placethe control of the System back into the hands of the family farmers. Thisindividual has apparently misinterpreted the purpose of the borrower rightsprovisions which is to afford borrowers certain rights as specified inthe Act. The ``control'' of the System need not be addressed in these regulationssince borrowers/stockholders already possess the means to ``control'' theSystem through the exercise of their voting rights. Since the Act and regulationsset forth the borrower rights, and the responsibilities and purpose ofSystem institutions and other qualified lenders concerning the rights,it is not necessary to write a statement of purpose and responsibilityin the regulations. (For the policy and objectives concerning the Act itself,see section 1.1 of the Act.) There were comments from farmers' groups and individuals concerning interactionwith the Farmers Home Administration (FmHA) programs. Commenters advocatedthat System institutions should refrain from taking any action, specificallyforeclosure action, until FmHA and FCA regulations are in place. Unlessthe Act provides otherwise, the new provisions of the statute were effectiveas of January 6, 1988, and System institutions are required to comply withthe requirements of the statute. One comment requested that the regulationsinstruct the System to use certain procedures of FmHA loan guarantee programs.Section 102 of the 1987 Act states that System institutions should useFmHA loan guarantee programs, as well as other restructuring measures ``consideringthe availability and appropriateness of such programs on a case-by-casebasis.'' Thus, the statute does not require the use of the FmHA programsin every instance, and FCA does not believe that the regulation should.One comment stated that some borrowers are being informed that they mustwaive their rights in order to obtain credit. The commenter did not statewhether he was referring to the waiver referenced in andSection; 614.4367(b),which is a waiver in connection with the sale of loans in the newly createdsecondary market. FCA believes that qualified lenders cannot otherwisedeny borrowers their statutory rights by making the waiver of their rightsa condition for receiving credit because to do so would render the borrowerrights provisions of the statute meaningless. System institutions willbe examined to ensure that borrowers are afforded these rights, and FCAmay use its supervisory and enforcement powers, where appropriate. Several comments were received concerning the issue of pending actionsor ``pipeline loans,'' i.e., loans upon which foreclosure proceedings mayhave been initiated, but not completed as of January 6, 1988, the effectivedate of the legislation. Specifically, comments were received which statedthat individuals are entitled to borrower rights if adverse actions andforeclosures were initiated prior to January 6, 1988 or if foreclosureswere pending, but not complete prior to January 6, 1988. Some commentssuggested that the restructuring provisions in the regulations should beapplicable even when the foreclosure process is complete or a lender hasreceived a foreclosure judgment, but the land has not yet been placed intoa lender's inventory. A comment was also received from members of Congressstating that the Act intends to extend restructuring rights to <T3>all </T3>borrowers with distressed loans, as long as the foreclosureprocess is not complete as of the date of enactment of the legislation.While the issue is not free from doubt, upon a review of the statutorylanguage, the FCA Board has concluded that as long as the foreclosure proceedingas defined in andSection; 4.14A(a)(4) of the Act was not complete as of January6, 1988, restructuring rights are applicable, if otherwise appropriate.Section 4.14A(b)(3) of the Act and andSection; 614.4519(b) state, ``No qualifiedlender may foreclose or continue any foreclosure proceeding with respectto any distressed loan before the lender has completed any pending considerationof the loan for restructuring * * *.'' The borrower rights provisions becameeffective on January 6, 1988, and as of that date, any borrowers with ``distressedloans'' (as that term is defined in the statute) are entitled to restructuringrights. These include loans subject to a pending foreclosure proceeding,<T3>not yet </T3>complete as of January 6, 1988. FCA cannot define whena foreclosure proceeding is complete because this is a matter of Statelaw. Comments on ``pipeline loans'' were received concerning rights offirst refusal as well. Similarly, FCA believes that if an institution had``acquired property'' as that term is defined in andSection; 614.4522, thathad not been sold as of January 6, 1988, the previous owner should be affordedhis first refusal rights. Comments were received that requested that the regulations ensure thatthe borrower rights provisions are applicable to borrowers who are in theprocess of bankruptcy proceedings and some commenters requested that theregulations apply to situations where an individual's debts have alreadybeen discharged in bankruptcy. FCA believes that the issue of whether theseprovisions are applicable in a bankruptcy proceeding is a determinationfor the courts to make and therefore has not included such a provisionin the regulations. Comments were received from FCCA and one Farm Credit Bank (FCB) concerningapplicability of other laws and regulations to the restructuring provisions.These comments recommended that the regulations provide that System institutionsneed not comply with certain other regulations and laws during the restructuringprocess. The comment from the System institution suggested that the regulationsstate that when restructuring distressed loans, lenders need not complywith other FCA lending regulations, specifically andSection;andSection; 614.4140,614.4150, 614.4180, 614.4190, and 614.4200. FCCA suggested that certainstatutory requirements (sections 1.6, 1.8, 1.9 and 2.4 of the Act) \1\<NOTE/> should be applicable only to the origination of new loans,but not to the restructuring of distressed loans. The reason offered forthe proposed changes is that there is a statutory mandate which requiresrestructuring of distressed loans when the criteria in the borrowers rightsprovisions are met, and this mandate should not be conditioned upon otherstatutory and regulatory requirements. The commenters further argue thatif restructured loans must comply with these other statutory and regulatoryrequirements, some restructuring proposals must be rejected. For example,there may be an instance where the cost of restructuring is less than thecost of foreclosure, but <T3>only if </T3>a System institution is able to restructure a loan beyondthe terms prescribed by the Act and regulations. A comment was also receivedfrom members of the Congress recommending that institutions be allowedflexibility to restructure loans by not requiring strict compliance withother statutory and regulatory provisions. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ These sections cited by FCCA are applicable to FederalIntermediate Credit Banks (FICBs) or Federal Land Banks (FLBs) under theAct before the 1987 revisions. These statutory requirements are now foundin andSection;andSection; 1.7, 1.9 and 1.10 and are applicable to Farm CreditBanks (FCBs), and in the case of andSection; 2.4, to production credit associations(PCAs). In the context of restructuring distressed loans, FCA believes that stockand collateral requirements, as well as provisions concerning the termof years of a loan which are otherwise applicable when an institution originatesa new loan, should not necessarily be applicable in all restructuring situations.System institutions must exercise their business judgment when consideringsuch requirements in a restructuring context in order to enhance the possibilityfor ultimate repayment of the loan consistent with the borrower's abilityto repay. However, if new funds are advanced, all such requirements areapplicable. Regarding andSection; 614.4140, <T3>Sound Loan, </T3>andSection; 614.4150, <T3>Credit Factors, </T3>and eligibility requirements, FCA does not believethat these requirements in any way impede loan restructurings. Institutionsare still expected to comply with safe and sound practices, and FCA willcontinue to examine for such compliance. Numerous comments concerned alleged lenders' noncompliance with the Act.Groups and individuals posed the question of what recourse or proceduresare available for individuals who have not and may not in the future begiven their rights. One attorney commented that the regulations shouldprovide that an aggrieved borrower has the right to seek the impositionof civil money penalties. Two individuals suggested that FCA should establishprocedures to process complaints regarding borrower rights. Specifically,one of these commenters suggested that formalized appeal procedures beestablished. Regarding civil money penalties, it is FCA and not private individuals,that determines whether a civil money penalty is appropriate. <T3>See </T3> andSection; 5.32 of the Act. FCA will continue through itsexamination process and related enforcement powers to determine whetherinstitutions are complying with applicable laws and regulations, includingborrower rights, and, where appropriate, FCA will seek remedial action,including imposition of civil money penalties. As for establishing procedures,since many of the provisions are new, FCA does not believe that establishingprocedures is appropriate or necessary at this time. Some comments suggested that FCA hold several hearings around the countryon the borrower rights provisions to allow many individuals the opportunityto comment on the proposed regulations. A public hearing was held in McLean,Virginia at FCA's headquarters, and FCA does not believe additional hearingsat different locations to be necessary, or cost effective. It would notbe an efficient use of time or resources to hold multiple hearings aroundthe country. Furthermore, every individual who wanted to comment was ableto do so by submitting written comments. Written comments were not givenany less consideration than those presented orally at the hearing. (Itshould be noted that even those individuals who testified were requiredto submit written comments covering the scope of their oral testimony.)Finally, many comments requested that the regulations be revised in suchways that would change the statutory language. In most instances, FCA hasclosely tracked the statutory language in an attempt to carry out Congressionalintent. Some additions were made that do not alter the existing languageor Congressional intent, but further explain the statutory requirements.Also, the Act refers to ``Districts.'' This language has been changed ordeleted as ``Districts'' may no longer exist after January 6, 1989 pursuantto section 412 of the 1987 Act. Finally, many commenters referred to thetechnical amendments bill, H.R. 3980 that has since passed. Thus, any appropriatechanges have been made. Comments by Section <ITAG tagnum="81">Part 614_Loan Policies and Operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart K_Disclosure of Loan Information </ITAG>The disclosure regulations set forth timely and meaningful loan disclosurerequirements that must be made by qualified lenders to prospective andcurrent borrowers such that those individuals may make informed decisions.Section 614.4365 Applicability. One comment suggested the addition of the phrase, ``except as to thoseprovisions not covered thereby'' to the end of this section, thus makingthe Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 1601 <T3>et seq. </T3>(commonly referred to as Truth in Lending Act (TILA))applicable. FCA does not agree with this suggestion. Section 4.13 of theAct clearly states that the disclosure requirements apply to all loansnot subject to TILA. The regulations accordingly comport with the statute.Another commenter suggested that TILA be used as a model for FCA's disclosurerequirements. Where appropriate, FCA used TILA as a guide. For example,the definition of ``loan origination charges'' is based on similar termsused in the regulations that implement TILA.Section 614.4366 Definitions. A few comments suggested that the ``effective interest rate'' should bethe same as the ``fixed rate.'' The rates are not and cannot be the sameas is explained by the definitions. The effective rate is an interest rate,either fixed or variable, which takes into consideration the amount ofstock purchased, loan origination charges, and other applicable factors,as further defined in andSection; 614.4366(b). FCCA commented that ``as a percentage of the initial net proceeds of theloan'' should be deleted since it may no longer be appropriate after thenew capitalization bylaws are adopted pursuant to section 4.3A(c)(1) (E)and (H) of the 1987 Act. FCA agrees and the regulation has been changedaccordingly. A few comments stated that the definition of a loan was not clear. Specifically,the following questions were posed: ``Is a ``loan'' a loan contract renegotiatedin restructuring for the purpose of disclosure?''; ``When does a loan applicationbecome a loan for secondary market pooling purposes?''; and ``Is a ``commitment''created at the time of execution of a loan contract, but before closing?''In general, the definition of a ``loan'' is provided in section 4.14A(a)(5)of the Act and FCA believes no further clarification is necessary. Regardingthe specific comments, FCA addresses these herein. FCA is unable to determinein all restructuring circumstances whether a new loan is created becausesuch cases depend on how the lender actually implements the restructuring.If a ``new loan'' is created, then the disclosure requirements are applicable.Regarding the secondary market issue, the definition of a ``loan'' is usedin this section for the purpose of determining what disclosures need tobe made. Thus, FCA need not address, in these regulations, the legal issueof at what point in time a loan exists since andSection; 614.4367(b) states<T3>at what time </T3>disclosures must be made regarding loans that willor may be pooled. However, for purposes of the disclosures, the issue ofwhen a ``commitment'' becomes a loan is not relevant since again the regulationsspecify <T3>when </T3>the disclosures must be made. Section 614.4367(a) statesthat disclosures must be made pursuant to this section ``not later thanthe time of loan closing.'' Finally, one commenter stated that the definition of ``standard adjustmentfactors'' is vague because he did not know what ``typically taken intoconsideration'' means. FCA believes that the definition is clear. It meansthose factors (and more than those listed in the definition may exist)ordinarily considered in adjusting the interest rate, according to loanpricing policies established by the individual institution. Section 614.4367 Required disclosures_in general. A number of comments requested that more information be disclosed. Thosecomments that requested that specific information be disclosed are discussedbelow. One comment made the general statement that more information shouldbe disclosed without specifying what information. On the other hand, afew lenders commented that there is a difference between complete disclosureand unnecessary disclosure. FCA agrees and has attempted not to requireunnecessary disclosure while simultaneously assuring that borrowers receivecomplete, timely, and meaningful disclosure of the information that theyneed in order to make informed credit decisions. One comment suggested that lenders clearly explain all billings made inconnection with a loan. Although FCA agrees that this is good businesspractice, FCA does not believe that it is appropriate to include this inthe disclosure regulations. The statute clearly states what type of informationshould be disclosed and billings are not included in that information.Another comment suggested that the availability of the loan review processshould be publicized. FCA assumes that this commenter was referring tothe disclosure requirements of andSection; 614.4368 and this is discussedbelow in that section. To the extent that the comment might have been referringto the credit review committee process, those disclosures are requiredunder andSection;andSection; 614.4441 and 614.4518. One individual suggested that each lender develop a glossary of terms usedin normal operations, including disclosures and loan restructurings, andthat the glossary be made available to every stockholder. FCA does notbelieve this is necessary since words and terms are adequately definednot only in Subpart K in andSection; 614.4366, but also in Subparts L andN in andSection;andSection; 614.4440 and 614.4512. One comment also suggestedthat a citation to TILA be added as a disclosure requirement. FCA disagreesfor the reasons explained in the discussion on TILA in andSection; 614.4365.Section 614.4367(a) Disclosures at loan closing. FCCA recommended that ``protected'' be substituted for ``guaranteed'' inandSection; 614.4367(a)(4) and similarly in Model Form No. 1 because althoughsection 4.13(a)(5) of the Act uses the term ``guaranteed,'' that term isnot reflective of the true status of eligible borrower stock under section4.9A of the Act. The comment also pointed out that ``guaranteed'' is notused anywhere in section 4.9A. Section 4.9A refers to ``eligible borrowerstock'' and FCA has changed the regulation to use this term instead ofeither ``protected'' or ``guaranteed.'' Some comments suggested that FCA should specify in andSection; 614.4367(a)(5)the various types of loan options with explanations of terms which farmerscan use to enable them to make decisions. Since individual lenders offerdifferent loan options, some of which may be distinctive to one lender,and since each FCB has its own policies and loan options, FCA does notbelieve it appropriate to further define ``loan options.'' One individual commented that he had a ``fixed rate loan'' and that despitethis fact, changes in the rate were made that were not previously disclosed.Pursuant to andSection; 614.4367(a)(2), if a rate is adjustable, the lendermust make the requisite disclosures. However, the borrower should be awareof the fact that the effective interest rate on ``fixed rate loans'' maybe subject to change (see andSection; 614.4366(c)), and that disclosure concerningthe effective interest rate must be made pursuant to andSection; 614.4367(a)(3).Section 614.4367(b) Disclosures for loans that may be pooled. FCCA asserted that the requirement in andSection; 614.4367(b)(2) for a borrowerto execute a waiver of restructuring rights if his loan will be pooledgoes beyond the requirements of the statute. FCCA suggested that no waiverbe required, and that alternatively if one is required that it be within3 days of commitment to coincide with the notification requirement of andSection;614.4367(b)(4). FCCA's rationale to eliminate the waiver requirement isthat it adds to an institution's paperwork and therefore inhibits the System'sability to compete in the secondary market. FCCA further argues that ifa waiver is required it should coincide with the 3-day notification requirementof andSection; 614.4367(b)(4) because as the proposed regulation is now written,a borrower may allow his loan to be pooled within 3 days of commitment,but may change his mind at the time of loan closing. Since pooled and non-pooledloans may have different terms, for a lender not to know until closingwhether a loan will be pooled makes it difficult, if not impossible, tohave properly prepared loan documents at the time of closing. Furthermore,FCCA asserted that if a lender does not know the status of the loan untilclosing, it may make it more difficult to plan for and package secondarymarket loans. Borrowers commented that the waiver requirement should bedeleted because borrowers should never have to waive their rights.FCA disagrees with FCCA and the borrowers that the waiver requirement shouldbe deleted. FCA believes that FCCA and the borrowers who commented on thisissue may have misunderstood the purpose of the waiver requirement. Thewaiver requirement actually operates as a protection for lenders, as wellas borrowers. Pursuant to section 8.9 of the Act, if a loan is pooled,restructuring rights do not apply. By requiring a waiver, the borrowermust be made fully aware of the fact that restructuring rights are notapplicable and the lender and borrower have demonstrated that they clearlyunderstand that these rights are not applicable. For this reason, althoughFCA understands that a small amount of additional paperwork is createdfor the lenders, FCA believes that the waiver requirement is necessaryso that borrowers and lenders are assured of notification of the consequencesof loan pooling. However, FCA agrees with FCCA that the waiver should coincidewith the 3-day requirement and the final regulation has been amended toreflect this change. Some farmer groups suggested that a model form for the waiver should beincluded in the regulations and used by all lenders for consistency. Therequirements of andSection; 614.4367(b)(2) are fairly simple, straightforwardand limited in nature such that FCA does not believe that a model formis required. A few comments from borrower groups suggested that prior tosigning a waiver, borrowers should be provided with an explanation of allof their rights associated with restructuring. Section 8.9 of the Act providesthat the notice shall inform the applicant that if a loan is pooled, sections4.14, 4.14A, 4.14B, 4.14C, and 4.37 shall not apply. Thus, FCA agrees thatthe notification must explain that these sections of the statute will notapply. The regulation has been revised accordingly. Section 614.4367(c) Changes in interest rates. A few comments suggested that the phrase ``other than standard adjustmentfactors'' be deleted in andSection; 614.4367(c)(3), thus making the regulationrequire disclosure of these factors 10 days before the effective date ofan increase. One comment suggested the following specific language: ``Suchnotice shall include the amount of each of the standard adjustment factorsand any other factors used to compute the new rate.'' FCA believes thisto be a redundant requirement and accordingly, the proposed language hasnot been adopted. Section 614.4367(a)(2)(ii) requires disclosure of thesefactors no later than the time of loan closing. Thus, FCA believes it isunnecessary to require this disclosure again, 10 days before the effectivedate of an increase. Some comments suggested that all such ``factors'' should be listed in theregulation. FCA does not believe such a list is necessary or practical.The regulation requires disclosure of ``any'' factors, thus it is unnecessaryto list all the possible factors. Furthermore, since the factors may bedifferent depending on the lender, situation, and other factors, it wouldbe of little value for FCA to attempt to compile a list. Many comments were submitted concerning the requirement for notificationof a rate increase 10 days before the effective date of the increase. Someborrower groups and individuals suggested that the notification be made30 days in advance so that individuals have sufficient time to exploreother alternatives. FCCA suggests that the notification requirement forincreases be the same as for decreases, i.e., no later than the effectivedate of the increase. FCCA asserts by way of example, that if an interestrate is increased effective on July 1, on a loan with a monthly repaymentschedule, the borrower will not have to pay the increased amount untilAugust 1. Although FCCA recognizes that interest is accruing at the newrate for the 30-day period preceding the August 1 payment date, FCCA assertsthat the borrower would still be given 30 days within which to seek alternativefinancing. FCCA further states that presently the proposed regulation givesthe borrower 40 days to seek refinancing and that while the 10-day differenceis not significant to the borrower, it is to the lender because of theadditional burden to the lender. FCCA argues further that the Federal ReserveBoard (FRB), which vigilantly oversees consumer lending, is more flexibleon this issue than the FCA. Even if FCA does not eliminate the 10-day requirementin general, FCCA argues that FCA ought to waive it if: (1) Lenders makeloans tied to an index entirely outside the control of the System, (2)the index is widely publicized and generally accepted throughout the businessand agricultural community, and (3) disclosures clearly referencing a primerate or other index are made when the loan is originated and closed. FCCAargues that since changes in the prime rate, for example, are largely unpredictableand outside the control of the lender, the proposed regulations as writtenare not compatible with such pricing methodology and that Congress couldnot have intended that the disclosure requirements impede such pricingpractices as evidenced by the fact that the 10-day requirement is not foundin section 4.13 of the Act. Although timely, meaningful disclosure is required, FCA must also balancethe costs to the lenders of disclosure requirements. If the disclosureregulations are so strict that System institutions have difficulty competingwith other lenders, then the entire System suffers, including, ultimately,the borrowers. FCA recognizes that the 10-day requirement is an added burdento the lender, but it also recognizes that the 10-day time period is significantto the borrower. The purpose of the disclosure regulations is to informborrowers of certain information so that they have sufficient time to makeinformed decisions and exercise options that may be available to them.Furthermore, the comments received by FCA from borrowers requesting 30-dayas opposed to 10-day advance notification indicate that the period is ofsignificance to borrowers. FCA is not persuaded by FCCA's reference tothe FRB since the System is in some ways unique and cannot be comparedto other financial systems. Furthermore, the FRB disclosure requirementsthat FCCA referred to provide for disclosure of an interest rate increasesubsequent to the increase, but only in very limited circumstances. Onthe other hand, FCA is not persuaded that the suggested 30-day time periodadvocated by borrowers is practical. This long a period would impose toogreat a burden on the lenders who are not always able to determine thatfar in advance when an increase will be necessary and the costs to themin potential lost revenues for that 30-day period may be significant. Onbalance, FCA believes that the 10-day requirement does not impose too greata burden on the lenders and that it is an adequate amount of time for borrowersto evaluate the effect of the increase and take whatever action they feelis necessary. Comments were also received that suggested that a 30-dayrequirement be added to andSection; 614.4367(d), as well. For the reasonsdiscussed above, FCA does not agree and the regulation has not been changed.In response to FCCA's comments advocating that notifications of rate increasestied to indexes such as prime rates be provided at the time of the increaseand not 10 days before, FCA believes that the theory behind the 10-dayadvance notice to allow borrowers to timely explore other options availableto them is equally applicable in these instances. Section 614.4367(e) Notice requirements. Commenters suggested that paragraph (e) of andSection; 614.4367 be changedto require notification to all parties. The reason offered for this recommendedchange is that all primary obligors are entitled to such disclosures andthere may be situations (e.g. during divorce proceedings) where all primaryobligors will not have access to the information. Although FCA agrees thatall primary obligors should have access to the information, it does notagree that lenders should be responsible for notifying every obligor. Eachprimary obligor is responsible for ensuring that he is fully informed byother primary obligors. FCA does not think it is appropriate to createunnecessary costs or responsibilities and this further notification wouldbe such a cost and responsibility. Appendix to 12 CFR 614.4367_Required disclosure_model disclosure forms.It was suggested that the model forms should be patterned after TILA. Withsome minor changes explained below, FCA believes that the proposed formsare adequate to give lenders an idea of how disclosures may be made. Itwas also suggested that the forms be more specific and that their use bemandatory. FCA does not believe that the forms need to be more specificsince the purpose of the forms is to give lenders an example of the typeof form that is appropriate. Furthermore, FCA does not believe that theforms must be mandatory. The use of the model forms is optional as longas lenders make the requisite disclosures.One lender found a conflict between the language of andSection; 614.4367(a)(3)and the model form. The lender commented that the text of the regulationseems to require disclosures using representative examples rather thanloan-by-loan calculations while the model form requires only the latter.The commenter asked for clarification on which FCA was requiring. FCA requiresboth. Section 4.13(a)(3) of the Act clearly requires the use of at leastone representative example when disclosing the effect that loan originationcharges or stock or participation certificate purchases have on the effectiveinterest rate. Thus, the initial disclosure of the effective interest rateshould take into account the required purchase of stock or participationcertificate and loan origination charges at the time of loan closing, ifnot before. In addition, at least one further disclosure is required whichstates what the effective interest rate would be if there were a changein the purchase requirement as it relates to the loan balance. Thus, themodel form has been changed to reflect this. One lender commented that although Model Form No. 2 requires disclosureof the effective interest rate, andSection; 614.4367(c) does not. AlthoughandSection; 614.4367(d) addresses the effective interest rate, FCA recognizesthat the lender's comment concerning andSection; 614.4367(c) is appropriateand the final regulation will be changed to reference the effective interestrate, as well. Finally, the model forms have been amended to refer to ``qualifiedlenders'' rather than ``System institutions.'' Section 614.4368 Disclosure of differential interest rates. A farmers group suggested that lenders provide a one-time communicationto ``non-troubled'' borrowers on their rights to a review of their loan.FCA believes that a notification should be provided to borrowers and hasrevised the regulation to require notification to prospective borrowersnot later than the time of loan closing. This notification may be madeat the same time as the disclosures required by andSection; 614.4367(a).Regarding current borrowers, lenders should notify them of their rightsunder this section at the time that they notify them of the next rate change.The same group also suggested that the regulation require that the lenderrespond to the borrower within 45 days. FCA does not see a substantialbenefit to this suggestion, especially since the borrower would have beennotified of the interest rate that he would be receiving no later thanloan closing. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart L_Actions on Applications; Review of Credit Decisions </ITAG>Subpart L sets forth definitions and the processes to be used in reviewsof credit decisions. Section 614.4440 Definitions. One commenter suggested that a glossary of terms should be developed Systemwideand made available to every borrower. Although such a glossary may be beneficial,FCA believes that the decision to develop such a glossary should be withinthe lender's discretion.One farmers group commented that ``borrower'' should be defined to includea person who holds System collateral, has System debt and/or holds Systemstock. The borrower rights provisions are applicable to ``loans'' from``qualified lenders'' as these terms are defined by the statute, and theregulations so provide. The definition of a loan is a ``loan made to afarmer, rancher, or producer or harvester of aquatic products for any agriculturalor aquatic purpose and other credit need of the borrower * * *.'' Sincethe definition of ``loan'' clearly indicates the individuals covered bythe borrower rights provisions, no further definition of borrower is required.Section 614.4440(a) Adverse credit decision. Farmers groups suggested that ``adverse credit decision'' should be expanded.Definitions were suggested that would include the following as ``adversecredit decisions'': A denial of a formal application for reduced interestrates, an increase in interest rates, and the classification of a loanas ``nondistressed'' and therefore not entitled to be considered for restructuring.The statute clearly defines those decisions that credit review committeesshould consider. The statute provides for review of the following adversecredit decisions: Denials of credit; approval of credit but in a lesseramount than that applied for; denials of restructuring applications; anddenials of requests to return a nonaccrual loan to accrual status, butonly for borrowers who were not delinquent at the time of such action andonly if an adverse action resulted from the change in status. Thus, thestatute does not allow for expansion of the definition of ``adverse creditdecision'' as suggested by the farmers groups. The FCCA suggested that``adverse credit decision'' be changed to limit reviews of a denial ofa request to return a loan to accrual status to conform to the requirementsset out in andSection; 614.4514 and 4.14 D(d)(2) of the Act, i.e., such reviewwould only be available to borrowers who have met all loan obligationsand only if placing a loan in nonaccrual status results in an adverse action.The proposed regulation was intended only to provide a review of the denialto return a nonaccrual loan to accrual status for those borrowers who meetall loan obligations when the change in status results in an adverse action.However, as FCCA points out, proposed andSection; 614.4440 could be interpretedto give all borrowers in all instances the right to this review. Therefore,the definition of applicant in the final regulation has been adjusted accordingly,and andSection; 614.4514 <T3>Borrowers who meet all Loan Obligations </T3>will be clarified to referenceandSection; 614.4441 <T3>Notice of Action on Loan Application, </T3>as well as andSection; 614.4443<T3>Review Process, </T3>making those sections applicable to the reviewof a denial for a request to return a nonaccrual loan to an accrual statuswhen there is an adverse action. Again, this would clarify that such reviewsapply to denials of credit; denials of restructuring applications; anddenials of requests to return a nonaccrual loan to accrual status, butonly for borrowers who were not delinquent at the time of such action andonly if an adverse action resulted from the change in status. Section 614.4440(c) Application for restructuring. One comment suggested that the regulation require that loan officers providea written copy of the restructuring policy to the borrower, that a borrowerrequest restructuring in writing, and that a ``casual comment'' by a Systeminstitution not constitute proper notification of restructuring rights.Section 614.4516 requires that a copy of a lender's written policy be providedto the borrower and andSection; 614.4440(c) defines an ``application forrestructuring'' as a <T3>written </T3>request. ``Casual comments'' by lenders would not complywith the formal written notifications required by the regulations. Farmers groups and individuals requested more specifics on what type ofinformation is required to be provided in an ``application for restructuring.''One group suggested that the definition be expanded, as well as clarifiedto create uniform, consistent procedures. Another comment suggested thatthe definition needs to emphasize that the lender and borrower should worktogether, negotiate and put forth a good faith effort. Most comments were concerned specifically with the ``preliminary restructuringplan.'' Commenters requested that the ``preliminary restructuring plan''be clearly defined as well, and that the regulations specifically statewhat type of information must be provided by the borrower by requiringthat the lender furnish a list of all the financial information and repaymentprojections that the lender will use to make its decision. Another commenterin asking for clarification of a ``preliminary restructuring plan'', wantedto know how much information constitutes a good faith application for restructuring.A few farmer groups suggested that to emphasize and clarify ``preliminary'',the regulations should state that a borrower can always amend his planand that the borrowers should be informed by the lenders of the costs offoreclosure and restructuring at a meeting. Another suggestion was madethat the regulations specify stages and timelines for the preliminary restructuringphase. One member of Congress suggested that the regulations need to stressthat submission of an application for restructuring is a ``preliminary''document in that the law intends to give borrowers the ability to submita plan which would be considered as a starting point for working out theloan with a lender. Further, the comment suggested that it must be madeclear that the lenders have to work with the borrowers. Four State attorneys general expounded on the suggestion that the costsof foreclosure and restructuring be disclosed to borrowers by suggestingthat the computational steps and assumptions used to arrive at the costsbe provided. However, unlike most of the other comments, they were of theopinion that detailed regulations governing every possible calculationswere not the solution. Rather, they opined that the better solution isfor FCA to develop a process which would provide for disclosure and goodfaith bargaining.One lender suggested that a definition of ``loan application'' or ``applicationfor a loan'' be inserted in andSection; 614.4440, as well as andSection; 614.4512to clarify the distinction between an ``application for restructuring''and a ``loan application''. The lender stated that andSection; 614.4441(c),which sets a 30-day time limit in which an applicant must request a review,may be interpreted to apply to restructuring applications, as well as toloan applications. However, as the lender pointed out, the time periodin which an applicant must request a review of a restructuring applicationis 7 days after receipt of the lender's notice, not 30 days as may be inferredby andSection; 614.4441(c) of the proposed regulations. The lender also statedthat the duplication of ``application for restructuring'', ``distressedloan'', and other terms in andSection; 614.4512 as well as in andSection; 614.4440is not necessary. Finally, FCCA commented that the word ``normally'' shouldbe deleted from andSection; 614.4440(c)(3), as well as from andSection; 614.4512(a)(3)to conform to the statute and to avoid needless confusion and uncertainty.FCCA reasons that to the extent that ``normally'' would limit a lender'sinquiry to information appropriate for making sound credit decisions inthe context of restructuring, it is redundant. FCCA further argues thatto the extent that ``normally'' might be read to prohibit a qualified lenderfrom obtaining information necessary to make a decision, it conflicts withthe statute. FCA does not believe it is appropriate to change the definition of ``applicationfor restructuring'' for the following reasons. FCA agrees that the borrowerand lender must work together in this process. However, no specific languagewas suggested on this point, and FCA believes that none needs to be insertedinto this regulation since it requires cooperation between borrower andlender. The regulation requires: (1) A preliminary restructuring plan thatis not finalized, but proposed, (2) the restructuring application mustbe submitted on appropriate forms prescribed by the lender, and (3) theremust be sufficient information and repayment projections, where appropriate,to allow a lender to support a decision. Therefore, the preliminary planmay be revised before it becomes final, based, in part, on communicationsbetween borrower and lender. Also, where information is not sufficientto allow the lender to support a sound credit decision, the lender mustcommunicate with the borrower such that the borrower provides sufficientinformation to enable the lender to make a sound credit decision. A readingof the statute and regulation, indicates that both parties must put fortha good faith effort and work together. FCA disagrees with those comments that requested a list of specific informationthat must be included in the application. The regulations already prescribewhat must be included in the application (as discussed in this section)and require that the lender provide ``all materials necessary to enablethe borrower to submit an application for restructuring'' (see andSection;614.4516(a)(2)). However, specific items other than these requirementscannot be identified and accordingly the regulation cannot prescribe suchitems. Each restructuring application will be different, depending on thetype of loan, borrower, lender, and other factors. The information thatconstitutes a ``good faith application'' may very well be different ineach case and FCA cannot provide an exhaustive list of specifics. For thesereasons, FCA should not and cannot create uniform, consistent procedures.Similarly, the regulations cannot specify stages and timelines for thepreliminary restructuring phase, because this may be different dependingon the circumstances. FCA does not agree that a ``preliminary'' plan should allow a borrowerto continually amend his plan in every instance. There must be a good faitheffort on the borrower's part, just as there must be good faith on thelender's part. As with any process, reasonableness must be a guide. Theborrower cannot unnecessarily delay restructuring or foreclosure by continuallyamending his plan, and as discussed below, a lender cannot create unnecessarydelays and obstacles to restructuring by unreasonably requiring unnecessarydocuments as part of the application. FCA disagrees with the comments that requested that the lender providethe costs of foreclosure and restructuring. In most cases this will beimpossible for a lender to do until and after the borrower has submittedan application for restructuring. To the extent that this comment meantthat a specific list of what the lender is including in these costs shouldbe provided, as stated immediately above each case may involve differentcosts. Thus there is no one list of items that objectively will be partof each and every application. FCA agrees with the comment from the Stateattorneys general suggesting that a process, not a detailed list is the solution. As explained immediately below, the regulations provide forsuch a process. (FCA has further addressed this issue of the lender providinginformation to the borrower, but <T3>after the decision </T3>is made, in the discussion in andSection; 614.4518<T3>Notice of Denial of Restructuring and Right to Review.</T3>) Although FCA agrees with the comment that the language of the statute givesthe borrower the ability to submit a <T3>plan </T3>which may be considered as a starting point for working outthe loan with a lender, it does not agree that this means that a restructuring<T3>application </T3>is a preliminary document. The language found in the1987 Act clearly makes a distinction between an ``application for restructuring''and a ``preliminary restructuring plan.'' The preliminary plan is a partof the application and while the plan may in some cases serve as a startingpoint, the application must be in a more finalized form. The applicationmust contain sufficient financial information and repayment projectionsto allow the lender to make a sound credit decision. Where that informationis not provided, the lender must contact the borrower to obtain that informationto enable the lender to make a sound credit decision. The lender cannotsummarily dismiss an application because it is incomplete. However, FCAdoes not mean to suggest that the lender should continue to deal with arecalcitrant  borrower, such that a lender is unable to take any actionconcerning the distressed loan. Once again a reasonableness standard mustbe applied.FCA acknowledges that the comment concerning what is applicable to a loanapplication, as opposed to a restructuring application expressed validconcerns. Accordingly, FCA has included a definition of ``loan application''and revised the regulation to clarify that andSection; 614.4441 applies toa loan applicant, not a restructuring applicant. Thus, a loan applicanthas 30 days from notification in which to request a review and as statedin andSection; 614.4518, an applicant for restructuring has 7 days from notificationin which to request a review. FCA does not agree that duplication of thedefinitions in andSection;andSection; 614.4440 and 614.4512 creates confusion.Since most sections in Subpart L are applicable to restructuring applications,as well as loan applications, the definitions must appear in both subparts.Finally, regarding FCCA's comment that ``normally'' should be deleted fromthe regulations, FCA did not intend its insertion to limit the lender fromrequesting information necessary to make its decision. Thus, ``normally''will be deleted. However, this deletion does not mean that a lender mayseek more information upon which to base a sound credit decision than itwould usually need in the ordinary course of business. The lender may notmake unreasonable, or unusual demands for information from the borrower.Section 614.4440(e) Distressed loan. One commenter suggested that the regulations should require a lender tonotify a borrower in writing when a loan becomes distressed and that theborrower should have an opportunity to discuss the status of the loan.One comment suggested that this notification be provided at least 45 daysafter a payment is missed. FCA does not believe it is necessary for a lenderto notify a borrower when his loan is distressed since andSection; 614.4516<T3>Restructuring Procedures, </T3>requires a lender to notify a borrowerthat his loan may be suitable for restructuring and this must be done notlater than 45 days before foreclosure proceedings begin. In order for alender to notify a borrower of the restructuring process, a determinationmust first be made that the loan is distressed. Thus, a borrower will knowthat the loan is distressed when the notification concerning restructuringis received. In addition, one of the characteristics of a distressed loanwill usually be that the loan is delinquent, and the borrower will be awarethat his own loan payment is past due. In any event, FCA does not believethat a borrower is prejudiced if he is not first notified that a loan isdistressed, as long as there is timely notification of restructuring rights.In response to the comment requesting that the regulation provide for anopportunity for the borrower to discuss the status of his distressed loan,FCA does not believe that andSection; 614.4440(e) must require this becauseFCA cannot conceive of a situation whereby a loan has become distressedand there is no discussion between lender and borrower at some point intime. In any event, andSection; 614.4516 provides the borrower with an opportunityto review the status of a distressed loan. Comments were submitted requesting that the regulations clarify the definitionof a ``distressed loan''. Two separate issues were raised. The first issuewas raised by FCCA in its comments on FCA's receivership and conservatorshipregulations, 12 CFR Part 611 (53 FR 16934, May 12, 1988). FCCA questionedwhether loans sold by a receiver to entities that are not qualified lenders,would be subject to borrower rights. The second issue concerns whetheradverse repayment trends on other than System loans may be considered byan institution when determining whether the loan held by the institutionis distressed. In response to FCCA's inquiry, there is no need to addressthis issue in the context of the borrower rights regulations. In the contextof fulfilling its duties established pursuant to the receivership provisionsin the Act, FCA determined that borrower rights are applicable to loansthat may be sold by the receiver for the former System institutions toentities that are not qualified lenders. Regarding the second issue of whether lenders may consider adverse repaymenttrends on other than System loans, the definition of distressed loan mustbe examined. The definition states, among other things, that a ``distressedloan'' is ``a loan for which the borrower does not have the financial capacity,to pay according to its terms and which exhibits one or more of the followingcharacteristics: (1) The borrower is demonstrating adverse financial andrepayment trends * * *.'' The lender must determine whether the borrowerhas the financial capacity to repay his loan. In order to make such a determination,a lender may have to consider repayment trends on other loans or accounts,where such information is available. Some comments suggest that ``as determined by the lender'' be deleted fromandSection; 614.4440(d) as commenters argued that the phrase narrows thestatutory definition by prohibiting the borrower from initiating contactwith the lender if the borrower thinks that he will be unable to meet upcomingpayments even before the lender is aware that a distressed loan may exist.One comment suggested that ``as determined by the lender'' be deleted,thus prohibiting a policy of one lender that does not consider a loan tobe ``distressed'' if the borrower is able to pay, but chooses not to. Inresponse to the first comment, FCA does not believe that the phrase narrowsthe statute. Nothing in the statute or the regulations prevents a borrowerfrom voluntarily contacting a lender if a borrower wishes to discuss restructuring.Also, andSection; 614.4516(c) of the regulation states that a qualified lendermay voluntarily propose a restructuring plan. In response to the secondcomment, FCA believes that the statutory framework does not contemplateextending restructuring rights to an individual who although able to payhas chosen not to. To allow otherwise would be to send a message to allSystem borrowers that they need not be concerned with repaying their Systemloans. This would be an unjustified burden for all paying borrowers, includingthose paying under restructuring plans. The legislation is intended toassist those borrowers with financial difficulties, not those seeking torenegotiate or avoid contractual obligations for their own convenienceand benefit. Section 614.4440(g) Qualified lender. One comment suggested that ``qualified lender'' was vague, but offeredno alternative or additional language to clarify the alleged vagueness.As the regulatory definition is consistent with the statutory definition,FCA does not believe further clarification is needed.FCA was questioned as to whether an institution that is placed in receivershipor conservatorship is itself a ``qualified lender.'' One commenter suggestedthat the question be answered affirmatively by adding the following languageto andSection; 614.4440(f)(1): ``including its conservator or receiver.''For the System institutions that were recently placed into receivership,FCA determined that the receiver must afford borrower rights. A member of Congress commented on the definition of qualified lender underandSection; 614.4512 concerning Federal Intermediate Credit Banks (FICBs).The definition of qualified lender includes any institution that ``makesloans'' as ``loans'' are defined in the Act. Section 614.4440(h) Restructure or restructuring. Comments suggested that the borrower and lender must use the same definitionof ``financially viable.'' One comment questioned what actions must betaken to be considered ``financially viable'', and what does ``the takingof any other action'' mean. However, no specific language was suggestedby the commenters to define these terms and FCA does not believe that specificlanguage is appropriate since financial viability as well as other actionsthat may be taken to modify the terms of a loan must be determined on acase-by-case basis. Section 614.4441 Notice of action on loan application. One comment suggested that FCA prescribe a certain notice or form for thenotice for all lenders. As long as lenders provide the information requiredby this regulation, FCA believes that the form of the notice is withina lender's discretion. One comment suggested that more information be provided to borrowers beforeany adverse action is taken. With some minor exceptions discussed below,FCA believes that the notice is adequate as prescribed by the regulations.One comment suggested that the lender notify the borrower of his rightto an independent appraisal and the method and procedures of exercisingthis right. FCA agrees and has revised the regulation accordingly. Regarding paragraph (a) which requires that the borrower be notified ofthe reasons for the lender's action, one comment suggested that ``tangible''reasons be provided. The remainder of the comments on this issue suggestedthat all factors, calculations, assumptions, and reasons upon which thelender's decision is based be provided to the borrower. One comment suggestedthat all factors and calculations be provided only if the lender deniesthe application to enable a borrower to decide whether he would like toseek review of the decision. FCA believes that <T3>specific </T3>reasons for a lender's decision on a loan applicationmust be provided to the borrower and the regulation has been revised accordingly.Specific reasons will enable a borrower to decide whether to seek review.FCA agrees with the comment that suggested that such information need onlybe disclosed when there has been a denial of the application and the regulationso provides. Finally, one comment suggested that notice be given to allprimary obligors. For the reasons discussed above in andSection; 614.4367(e),FCA disagrees. Section 614.4442 Credit Review Committee. One comment suggested the title of this section be Credit Loan Review Committee.FCA disagrees since pursuant to section 4.14(b) of the Act, the committeewill review denials of restructuring applications, as well as loan applications.A comment suggested that all avenues should be explored with the loan officerbefore the committee process begins. FCA agrees with this comment sincethere is no right to a credit review until the institution has first madea decision. Thus, the lender, usually through the loan officer, and theborrower were engaged in a cooperative effort to attempt to find solutionsbefore the credit review committee process began. General comments were submitted that suggested the regulations should clearlyspell out the function and procedures of the committee, emphasizing theimportance of the committee being an independent review process and morethan a mere ``rubber stamp''. Included in these procedures should be guidelinesof eligibility for serving on the committee, including those individualswho are to constitute ``farmer board representation'' as required by section4.14(a)(1) of the Act. The FCA does not believe that it should specify additional functions andprocedures for the credit review committees other than those prescribedby the regulation. The regulation states that the function of the committeeis to review adverse credit decisions. This function is prescribed by section4.14 of the Act and FCA is not persuaded that the regulation should requirefunctions other than those in the Act. As long as those committees functionas required by statute and regulation, FCA believes that each lender isentitled to develop its own set of procedures. The statute and regulationsprovide for adequate safeguards, including that the loan officer involvedin the adverse credit decision being reviewed is prohibited from servingon the committee. Also, andSection; 614.4444 requires that records of thecommittee be kept and these records will be used, by FCA examiners to determinewhether the committee is functioning properly. One comment suggested that the borrower should receive written notice abouthis right to appear in person and about what documentation will be considered.Section 614.4441 requires notification of the right to appear and an explanationof the process, which includes the ability to present documents to supportinformation contained in the unsuccessful application, as provided in andSection;614.4443(b). One comment suggested that the lender notify the borrowerof what documents he or she may submit to ensure that new plans or documentsare not submitted which do not address the original decision. The commenterrequested that FCA emphasize that this is a review process and not an opportunityfor the borrower to bring up new issues. FCA believes that the regulationclearly indicates that this is a review process and is not persuaded thatthe regulation needs to be revised. Many comments were received on the role of the loan officer. The same commentwas received from many individuals suggesting that the credit review committeeshould not be allowed to influence a loan officer's decision. Other commentssuggested the converse, i.e. that the loan officer not be allowed to influencethe committee. Comments suggested that the loan officer's role as it relatesto the committee should be clearly defined to be a minimal one and thatmore guidance should be given on what it means to ``serve'' on a committee.One comment from a member of Congress suggested that since section 4.14(a)(2)of the Act prohibits a loan officer involved in the initial decision fromserving on the committee, that officer should not be. present during thereview, voice any opinion before the committee, or participate in the committeereview process in any way. A lender responded to this comment by suggestingthat ``appearing'' before the committee is not the equivalent of ``serving''on the committee. The lender stated that a loan officer should be ableto present information and answer questions before the committee, but shouldnot ``serve'' by deliberating on and voting with the committee. The loan officer's role should be determined by the credit review committeeor the lender, as long as the officer does not <T3>serve </T3>on the committee. The statute prohibits <T3>``serving'' </T3>on the committee when it reviews a loan on which theofficer made the initial decision, not <T3>participation </T3>on the committee and it would be unreasonable todefine ``serve'' as broadly as suggested by the Congressman's comment.The credit review committee must make informed decisions, and in orderto do so it is reasonable to assume that it will need to be informed bythe one person most knowledgeable on the lender's decision, i.e. the loanofficer. Thus, it would not be inappropriate for the loan officer to beat the review to present the reasons for the lender's decision or to answerany questions that the committee may have. The only prohibition is thatthe loan officer may not ``serve'' on the committee, by being present orparticipating during the committee's ultimate deliberations, voting, orfinal decision-making process. Many comments were received on eligibility for membership on the committee.Comments suggested the following: That a farmer should be on the committee,that a farmer should be on the committee to ensure stockholder control,that a borrower's representative should sit on the committee, that a borrowershould be able to choose an impartial committee member, that the borrowershould be able to refuse any individual who worked with the borrower inany ``adverse'' situation in the past, that the borrower should be ableto refuse at least one member if the borrower can show bias, that the borrowershould be able to refuse a member ``for cause'', and that a borrower shouldbe able to refuse a member under any circumstances. In addition, therewere many comments on the requirement for a director to serve as a member,which are discussed immediately below.Regarding the requirement for a farmer on the committee, there is a requirementfor ``farmer board representation'' in the statute. At the outset, FCAmust clarify that a strict reading of this statutory requirement wouldbe incorrect. FCA previously considered this issue (51 FR 39486, October28, 1986) and expressed the opinion that the term ``farmer board representation''means that in order for a person to serve on an institution's board thatperson must be a farmer, rancher, or producer or harvester of aquatic products.There have not been any statutory changes that would cause FCA to reviseits position. Thus, FCA reiterates this position and states that wheneverthe term ``farmer representation'' is used, FCA is referring to farmer,rancher, or producer or harvester of aquatic products. In response to those comments advocating farmer representation, the FCAhas required farmer representation in the regulations. System institutions'boards are elected by the stockholders, who must be farmers, ranchers,and producers or harvesters of aquatic products. One of these board membersmust sit on the committee and if the stockholders are not satisfied thatthere is adequate ``farmer representation'', then the stockholders mayremedy this situation during the next board elections, by electing a boardthat will better serve the stockholder/borrower interests. (There may besome qualified lenders that are not System institutions, i.e. ``other financialinstitutions'' (OFIs) as described in section 2.3(a) of the Act. Theseare discussed below concerning the credit review committee and its composition.)All of the other suggestions concerning the composition of the committeeseem to be based on the concern that the borrower will not have adequaterepresentation on the committee, and thus not receive a fair review. However,FCA does not believe this to be a valid concern. The review process adequatelyensures that a borrower will receive a fair review. A borrower may be accompaniedby counsel or any other representative of such person's choice to seeka reversal of the decision. Furthermore, the regulations prohibit the loanofficer involved in the adverse credit decision from serving on the committee.Thus, FCA does not agree with the suggested changes to the regulation.Comments were submitted suggesting that the credit review committee meetingbe held in a ``neutral'' or ``convenient'' location, and not at a Systeminstitution's office. FCA believes that the lender or the committee shouldbe responsible for selecting the location. Given all of the processes discussedin this section, which the borrower has available to him to ensure a fairreview, FCA does not believe that prescribing a ``neutral'' or ``convenient''location in the regulations is necessary. Furthermore, assuming that a``neutral'' or ``convenient'' location can be agreed on by both parties,FCA does not believe it is an efficient use of a lender's resources torequire the lender to attempt to find a location, transport the committeeto a location, or pay for the use of such a location when the lender'soffice may adequately serve as a meeting place for the committee. A Federal land bank association (FLBA) is not a qualified lender unlessor until it becomes a direct lender and ``makes loans'' as ``loans'' isdefined in the Act. Therefore, FCCA, three lenders and one individual farmerexpressed concern over the fact that an FCB board member is required toserve on a committee that must review many decisions that may have beendelegated to or made at a number of FLBAs. The comments suggested thatthe Act does not require that a qualified lender's board member be on thecommittee, only that the qualified lender's board of directors establishone or more credit review committees with ``farmer board representation''.The commenters argued that to require an FCB director to serve on the committeeat the local level will create delays and costs because the FCB directormay not be as familiar with local conditions nor as appreciative of thecircumstances surrounding particular adverse credit decisions as an FLBAdirector would be. Thus, the commenters asserted that there will be addedtime and expense for these directors to become knowledgeable about localconditions, and to meet on the local level at many associations. The comments further assert that Congress intended for borrowers to have``grass roots'' involvement, and for the FCB board directors to have flexibilityin redelegating their duties. When an FCB committee reviews an adversecredit decision made at an FLBA on a loan which exceeds an FLBA's loanapproval authority, it was further stated that it is questionable whetherFCB board participation satisfies the statutory requirement of ``farmerboard representation'' or the ``grass roots'' representation since FCBboard members are not elected by the borrowers. FCCA noted that there willbe instances where although an FCB retains it direct lending authority(and thus is the ``qualified lender''), most adverse credit decisions willcontinue to be made by the servicing FLBAs under their delegated loan approvalauthority. Thus, FCCA argued that the proposed regulation is internallyinconsistent, and will at least have to be revised to reflect the factthat extensive loan approval authority has been delegated to the FLBAs.FCCA suggested that regular board members, as duly elected representativesof the local association, not advisory members should be allowed to serveon a committee, with an equal number of loan officers. Furthermore, FCB'sshould be allowed to prescribe guidelines for associations and the FCB,within which committees must operate and to delegate the committee functionto the FLBAs with respect to those long-term loans that are serviced atthe association level and for which the FLBAs have loan approval authority.FCCA asserts that its position is consistent with FCA's initial regulationissued in final form in October 1986, appropriately reflects the uniquestatutory and regulatory relationship between banks and associations, andprovides the borrower with a review by the actual decisionmaker. The lenders also expressed somewhat of an opposite concern that advocatedthe lines of authority of the committees flow upward, as opposed to downward.The lenders are fearful that the proposed regulations prevent the reviewcommittee function from being performed at the bank level even though productioncredit association (PCA) loans may require bank prior approval or OFI loansmay be submitted to the banks for discount. Thus, even though the ultimatecredit decision would be made at the bank level, the PCA or OFI will performthe credit review functions pursuant to the language in the proposed regulations.The lenders state that if the credit review decision is not made at thebank level, or at least with bank representation, the review process isnot meaningful to the borrower. Thus, one lender suggested that ``qualifiedlenders'' should be defined to include an FCB when it makes the creditdecision, so that the FCB may use its committee to review the loan. Inopposition to this view, one comment was received that suggested that whenlending authority is transferred from an FCB to merging associations, therequirement of ``farmer board representation'' would be better satisfiedby representation from the originating association even though the loanmay require prior approval.FCA disagrees with FCCA's and the lenders' assertions that FCB board membersmay delegate their responsibilities to FLBA board members. FCA has previouslyconsidered this issue and for the reasons previously articulated, FCA doesnot believe that a change is warranted. FCA reiterates that stockholdershave a legitimate interest in having an elected board member of the institutionactively participate on the credit review committee. Therefore, delegationto an alternate who may perform the credit review committee duties is permissible,as long as the alternate is also a member of the same institution's board.In response to FCCA's assertion that the regulation is inconsistent becauseFLBA's have been delegated certain authority, the FCB is ultimately responsibleand maintains ultimate authority for those associations unless and untilthey become direct lenders. FCA recognizes that PCAs require prior approval on certain loans as prescribedby regulation. The borrower should be allowed the opportunity to have anadverse decision reviewed by the actual decisionmaker. FCA does not intendthat the credit review committees at the association level should reviewa decision ultimately made by the bank and has changed the regulation accordingly.Thus, in response to both suggestions made by the lenders and FCCA, FCAhas ensured that the credit review function is performed by the ultimatedecisionmaker. In connection with the concerns centering around FLBAs and PCAs, FCA believesit appropriate to address the issue of agricultural credit associations(ACAs). The Act authorizes the merger of a PCA and FLBA into an ACA. AnACA is a qualified lender, since it would make ``loans'' as that term isdefined by statute and as such is subject to all of the borrower rightsprovisions of the Act and regulations. Comments were also submitted requesting guidance for OFIs without boardsof directors. All qualified lenders, even those without boards of directorsare required to have a credit review committee pursuant to statute. Thenew statutory provisions on credit review committees apparently did notcontemplate the situation where a lender does not have a board of directors.Thus, Congress was silent on this issue. However, Congressional intentdictates that qualified lenders without boards establish review committeessimilar to those as established by lenders with boards. Thus, for thoselenders without boards, any corporate entity similar to a board shouldestablish a committee(s) and any individual occupying a position similarto a board member should sit on the committee, so that lenders withoutboards have a credit review committee process as similar as possible tolenders with boards. All the other requirements of the regulation are applicable.FCA does not believe it should establish specific guidelines at this timebecause each lender without a board may offer unique problems. Thus, FCAwill address these problems as they may arise on a case-by-case basis.Section 614.4443 Review process. A comment was submitted that suggested that the regulation should applyto both loan and restructuring applications. The regulation is intendedto be applicable to both and the final regulations will clarify this byproviding that andSection; 614.4518 refers to andSection; 614.4443. Many commentsalso understood paragraph (b) to be applicable only to loan applications,and not restructuring applications. Due to the many comments submittedon this issue, language will be added to paragraph (b) to clarify thispoint. Section 614.4443(a) Personal appearance. FCCA suggested that for clarity ``such person'' be added before the word``choice'' and that ``and/or'' should be replaced with ``or'' to conformto the statutory language. FCA agrees with these suggestions and the regulationhas been changed accordingly. However, FCA does not intend its replacementof ``and/or'' with ``or'' to in anyway limit a borrower's right to haveavailable more than one representative, wherever reasonable or appropriate.Section 614.4443(c) Independent appraisals. Most of the comments received were on the criteria for ``independent''appraisals and ``independent'' appraisers. Comments suggested that an independentappraiser should be defined as: An individual not being employed by theSystem or FmHA during the 2 years prior to the appraisal, ``accreditedappraisers approved by a qualified lender but not employed by or contractingfor said lender'', and never employed as an appraiser or loan officer forthe lender. A comment from the Society of Real Estate Appraisers suggestedthat more attention should be given to selecting professionally qualifiedappraisers. Other comments questioned what experience an appraiser wouldneed to qualify for the lender's list. All of these issues will be addressedin a separate <T4>Federal Register </T4>document on eligibility and lending authorities.Comments were submitted that suggested that the regulations allow for anappraisal at the first point of disagreement between the loan officer andborrower or at the first point in the restructuring process. A commentwas submitted that suggested that appraisals should be allowed when a borrowerapplies for a new loan or for restructuring. Other comments suggested thatthe regulations not limit the right to an appraisal to situations whereadditional collateral is requested by the lender in a restructuring context.As support for this, one commenter cited to the H.R. 3980, the TechnicalAmendments bill. One commenter stated that this requirement for additionalcollateral implies that the lender has the right to demand additional collateralwhich this commenter interpreted as being in contravention of the Act.The commenter reasoned that additional collateral cannot be a preconditionfor restructuring because the standard for the lender's decision is limited<T3>only </T3>to determining whether the cost of restructuring is lessthan the cost of foreclosure, and additional collateral should not factorinto this decision. Another comment stated that the regulation limits theright to an appraisal to the credit review committee process, while thestatute permits appraisals during restructuring, as well. This commentersuggested that the regulation permit an appraisal during the review process,any time additional collateral is requested, or if additional collateralis proposed as part of a restructuring plan. The statute prior to passage of the technical amendments bill stated thatan appraisal may be requested as a part of an appeal before the creditreview committee by an applicant for a loan (section 4.14(d)(1)), and byan applicant for restructuring for which additional collateral was demandedby the lender (section 4.14(d)(4)). Although the technical amendments billdid not eliminate section 4.14(d)(4), it broadened the rights of a restructuringapplicant to allow an appraisal in any restructuring context whether ornot additional collateral was demanded by the lender. The regulations accordinglyconform to the statute as revised by the changes in the technical amendmentsbill. In response to the commenter that stated that the lender cannot demandadditional collateral, this individual failed to consider section 4.14(d)(4)of the Act which states that an appraisal shall be permitted if additionalcollateral is demanded by a lender when determining whether to restructurea loan. One comment suggested that a borrower should be allowed to use any independentappraiser approved by the lender. One lender complained that providinga copy of the appraisal to the borrower limits the lender's negotiatingpower and ultimately decreases the price of land, thus advocating thatappraisals not be disclosed to the borrower. Another commenter suggestedthat a request for an appraisal could be made to regional supervision priorto the review committee stage to speed up the process and to help the borrowerdecide whether to appeal the lender's determination. The statute specificallyaddresses these issues in section 4.14(d) (2), (3), and (1), respectively,and FCA is not persuaded that the regulatory requirement should be inconsistentwith the statutory one. Thus, the borrower must select <T3>one </T3>of three appraisers, the lender must provide a copy of theappraisal to the borrower, and the appraisal may be requested as a partof the request for the review process. In response to the comment thatsuggested that the request for an appraisal should be made to regionalsupervision, FCA is of the opinion that the manner in which the requestis dealt with at the institution is in the lender's discretion.One comment suggested that the independent appraisal process should bedescribed in andSection; 614.4518. FCA believes that it should be referenced,not described, in andSection; 614.4518 and the regulation will be changedaccordingly. FCCA and one lender commented that the 30-day time period for providingthe list of appraisers, providing a copy of the appraisal, and consideringthe results of any such appraisal is unrealistic. FCCA asserted that allof these requirements cannot be accomplished within the 30 days, especiallysince there is no time period specified within which the borrower mustselect an appraiser. FCA agrees and will revise the final regulation accordingly.FCA has also required that the borrower select an appraiser within 30 daysfrom the borrower's request for an appraisal. This revision to the regulationis supported by the language in section 4.14(d)(2) of the legislation whichindicates that Congress was concerned with the potential delay in thisprocess. Requiring the borrower to select an appraiser within 30 days ofhis request for an appraisal will help ensure that this process is notunnecessarily delayed. The lender shall provide the list to the borroweras soon as possible after his request for an appraisal to allow the borroweradequate time to select the appraiser within the 30-day period. One lender suggested that the proposed regulation should be revised topermit or encourage a borrower to contract with one of three appraisersdirectly to minimize any allegations of a lender's influence. FCA believesthat these allegations can be better addressed by ensuring that appraisersperform their job in a professional manner. Section 614.4443(d) Decision. One comment stated that use of the phrase ``sole discretion'' implies thatthere are subjective standards that the committee may use in making determinations,and thus ignore the cost of foreclosure/cost of restructuring test. Thiscommenter also stated that the language in paragraph (d) implies that thereis no further review of a committee's decision and that the language shouldbe revised to make it clear that this is not the case. One comment suggestedthat the reviews and decisions should not be so expeditious as to givea borrower inadequate preparation time and that the decision should notbe on the same day as the deadline for a borrower's response to a lender'scounterproposal. Another commenter suggested that the review process shouldbe conducted as quickly as possible. Finally, a comment was submitted suggestingthat the regulation should establish a process for documenting the meeting.FCA believes that some commenters misunderstood the credit review committeeprocess. The credit review committee will be reviewing a determinationpreviously made by the lender. If it was a decision on a restructuringapplication, the committee will review the lender's decision which wouldhave compared the cost of foreclosure with cost of restructuring, as wellas documents submitted by the borrower. Nothing in the regulation statesor implies otherwise. The ``sole discretion'' language is necessary toprevent outside, undue influence on the committee's review and decision.Regarding the comment on further review, the regulations set out the proceduresfor the Special Asset Group and National Special Asset Council and andSection;614.4443 does not prevent these procedures from being established whereapplicable. However, FCA believes that the credit review committee's decisionis the final decision <T3>of the lender. </T3>In response to the comment concerning the expeditiousnessof the committee's review and decision, the borrower must be given an opportunityto prepare for the meeting. However, the decision must still be made asexpeditiously as possible to prevent undue delay and costs to the lenderand borrower. Thus, the words ``reasonable effort'' are found in the regulationto provide for an expeditious process that allows borrowers adequate opportunityto prepare for the meeting. Regarding the concern of adequate time to respondto a counterproposal, the commenter apparently misunderstood the functionof the committee. Any counterproposals should have occurred at the lender'sprior decision-making stage or before, and <T3>not </T3>during the committee review process which is reviewing thedecision that was already made by the lender. FCA agrees with the commentthat the meeting should be documented. Thus, lenders must keep completefiles as established pursuant to andSection; 614.4444 and FCA has revisedandSection; 614.4444 to require that minutes of the meetings be maintainedas well. Section 614.4444 Records. FCCA suggested that the second sentence should apply to ``certified lenders''only and not to ``qualified lenders'', since lenders are required to havespecial asset groups (SAGs), only if they are certified. FCA does not agreewith this comment. All qualified lenders must keep records because a qualifiedlender may eventually become a certified lender and the SAG may want toreview past decisions. Furthermore, FCA examiners may need to review therecords of qualified lenders as part of their examination process to ensurecompliance with borrower rights, as well as to examine for other regulatoryconcerns. To ensure that adequate records are kept for FCA examiners aswell as for the SAGs, FCA has included a requirement that minutes of thecredit review committees be maintained. One individual suggested that borrower files not be destroyed. FCA doesnot agree that this requirement should be inserted into the regulationsince the banks and associations already have their own recordkeeping requirements.Finally, one comment suggested that procedures for disclosure of informationto borrowers be incorporated into this section and that a process wherebya borrower can place items in his file for later review by a SAG or theNational Special Asset Council (National Council) must also be developed.These issues are discussed under andSection; 614.4520. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart N_Loan Servicing Requirements; State Agricultural Loan MediationPrograms; Rights of First Refusal </ITAG>Subpart N sets forth restructuring policies and procedures, and requirementsfor reviews of restructuring decisions. In addition, requirements for Systeminstitutions' participation in mediation programs and rights of first refusalare addressed. Other subjects that are discussed are uninsured voluntaryand involuntary accounts and protection for certain borrowers. Section 614.4512 Definitions. FCA has already addressed many issues applicable to this section in itsdiscussion on andSection; 614.4440, <T3>Definitions. </T3>Those that were not discussed or that are pertinentonly to this section are addressed below. In general, comments were receivedcriticizing a lack of clarity in the definitions. Yet most commenters failedto specify which terms they felt were unclear. To the extent that specificterms were discussed, FCA has addressed those below. Section 614.4512(c) Cost of foreclosure. There were a number of comments submitted on this section expressing divergentviews. Some farm groups suggested that the definition should be more specificand detailed to ensure consistency. Some commenters offered specific suggestions,such as requiring a lender to compute attorney fees by using a pro ratashare of a retainer, when applicable. Another suggestion stated that thecosts should not include assets that a borrower may have, other than thecollateral on the distressed loan. One comment stated that when calculatingthe cost of restructuring, computations on the potential earning streamto be generated by the restructured loan should be used, taking into accountthe present cost of money to the lender. A suggestion was made that thedefinition should be more detailed, but on the other hand should also ensurean individual analysis using case-by-case estimates that consider all factorsunique to each case. Other comments from farm groups also suggested thatthe cost of foreclosure be done on a case-by-case basis and that the useof generalized formulas should be discouraged. FCA agrees with the commentsthat expressed a preference for case-by-case analysis to ensure that eachborrower will receive individualized consideration on his loan application.FCA believes that flexibility is necessary because of differences in Statelaw and individual circumstances. Therefore, FCA declines to change theproposed regulation to include a list of factors in the definition of ``costof foreclosure.''Section 614.4512(d) Distressed loan. One commenter questioned whether the financing of the sale of acquiredproperty when no stock purchase is required may be considered to be a ``loan''for restructuring purposes. This type of financing is not a ``loan'' forrestructuring purposes, unless the lender treats the financing the samein all respects as if the lender were making a loan to an ``eligible''System borrower, as referenced in 12 CFR 613.3000, <T3>et seq. </T3>As a result, purchasers of acquired property who receivefinancing provided solely to facilitate disposition of that property donot necessarily qualify for borrower rights. If these purchasers wish tohave access to those rights, they may do so by accessing the regular lendingauthorities of the institution. Section 614.4512(e) Foreclosure proceeding. When the proposed regulations were published, FCA asked for comment onwhether the regulation should specify when a foreclosure proceeding begins.FCCA indicated that there was no reason to specify when a foreclosure proceedingbegins and with differences between various State laws, and judicial andnon-judicial foreclosures, FCCA questioned the utility of such a definition.Although many other comments stated that FCA should define this point intime, no specific suggestions as to how it should be defined were offered.The comment that came closest to offering a specific suggestion statedthat the regulation should reference a point in time at which any actionis taken to begin the foreclosure process. FCA believes that the regulationalready employs this definition. The statute clearly defines a foreclosureproceeding in section 4.14A(a)(4), as does the regulation as ``a foreclosureor similar legal proceeding to enforce a lien on property, whether realor personal, that secures a nonaccrual or distressed loan'' or as ``theseizing of and realizing on nonreal property collateral, other than collateralsubject to a statutory lien arising under title I or II, to effect collectionof a nonaccrual or distressed loan.'' Accordingly, the proceeding beginswhen the lender begins either of the two actions referenced above. Therefore,FCA does not believe that it is necessary to further define when the proceedingbegins. Section 614.4512(h) Restructure or restructuring. One comment suggested that this term needs to be better defined as it ismisleading to borrowers because based on the definition, borrowers mayassume that they are entitled to have their distressed loans restructured.FCA does not believe that the definition creates such an expectation andthus declines to revise the regulation. FCCA states that insertion of theword ``means'' is more limiting than the statute which uses the word ``includes''instead. FCA does not agree. The definition in the regulation includesevery action that could possibly be considered to constitute a restructuring,thus the definition is not in any way restrictive. In addition, FCA believesthat ``means'' as opposed to ``includes'' is appropriate to maintain consistencywith all other definitions found in these regulations. Section 614.4513 Advance payment accounts. Some of the comments received on this section indicated a lack of understandingas to the intended purpose of the Act and this implementing regulation.One comment stated that a System institution should not be allowed to substituteor alter which debtors are paid. Some comments asked for an explanationof involuntary accounts. One comment stated that paragraph (b) should beeliminated because it violates a borrower's right to make management decisions.Another comment stated that policy and practice should not allow this paragraphto exist. Finally, one comment stated that the definition of the terms``uninsured voluntary or involuntary accounts'' should be repeated. The wording and title of the regulation have been revised to clarify thesection. The intent of this section is twofold. Both paragraphs are forthe benefit and protection of the borrower and lender. Paragraph (a) allowscertain borrowers to make advance payments on their accounts and authorizesinstitutions to accept payments prior to due dates in the loan agreement.Such payments may be applied immediately against the loan or the paymentsmay be placed in an interest bearing account and later withdrawn by theborrower for purposes for which a lender would ordinarily increase a borrower'sloan. Paragraph (b) allows institutions to enter into loan agreements thatprovide for disbursement of funds on a scheduled basis, such as paymentsmade on the completion of construction of a facility which serves as collateralon the loan. This protects not only the collateral, but ensures that certainof the borrowers obligations are timely paid. Section 4.37 of the statute provides that <T3>System institutions </T3>may maintain such accounts. Thus, the finalregulation will be changed to apply to System institutions, as opposedto qualified lenders. One comment questioned how these accounts are to be applied in the eventthat a System institution is liquidated. This issue will be addressed bynecessary revisions to the regulations in 12 CFR Part 611 concerning thedisposition of these accounts by a receiver in a separate <T4>Federal Register </T4>document. Section 614.4514 Protection of borrowers who meet all loan obligations.A farmers group suggested that the regulations should require lenders tonotify borrowers of their rights under this section. FCA disagrees withthis comment as the statute does not require such notification. A lenderstated that neither the Act nor the regulation addresses the issue of defaultunder contractual terms other than failure to meet scheduled payments,referred to as ``nonmonetary defaults'' by the lender. The lender furtherasserted that while the proposed regulation could be interpreted to permitappropriate legal action for these ``nonmonetary defaults'', it would reduceinterpretive problems if the regulation addressed the issue specifically.The regulation only speaks to specific actions from which the lender isprohibited, when a borrower has complied with certain obligations. Theregulation does not, nor is it intended to prevent any other recourse thata lender may legally have available to it. Thus, FCA disagrees with thelender that the issue of nonmonetary defaults needs to be addressed. Section 614.4514(b) Limits on the reduction of principal. One borrowers group commented that the regulation should prohibit a lenderfrom requiring that a borrower reduce the outstanding principal balanceof a loan by more than the scheduled amount if a borrower sells or disposesof collateral <T3>in the ordinary course </T3>of his business or at an otherwise authorizedsale. FCA agrees and will revise the regulation accordingly. One comment suggested that if a lender legally accelerates the principalreduction, the lender should be required to negotiate a new loan agreementindependent of the loan contract. FCA believes that the form of the agreementis a matter that should be decided by the parties. Thus, FCA is not persuadedthat the language of the regulation should be revised. Section 614.4514(d) Placing a loan in nonaccrual status. One legal aid organization suggested that the regulation should prohibita lender from placing a loan of a borrower who meets all of his obligationsin nonaccrual status. However, the Act contemplated this possibility. Accordingly,section 4.14D of the Act does not prohibit such action, but affords borrowerscertain safeguards if a lender takes such action. Thus, FCA will not changethe regulation to contradict the statute by prohibiting such action. One comment suggested that a time frame should be specified in which theborrower must appeal to the credit review committee. FCA agrees and hasprovided the borrower with 30 days after receipt of the notification inwhich to request a review, consistent with andSection; 614.4441.FCCA suggested that the regulation should be revised by adding ``only if''to make it clear that the borrower is entitled to a review only if theplacing of a loan in nonaccrual status results in an adverse action. Inresponse to FCA's request for comments in the preamble to the proposedregulations, FCCA also stated that the one example of ``adverse action''in the regulation helps to clarify what an ``adverse action'' is and thatthere is no significant benefit from including additional examples or furtherdefining ``adverse action.'' Although other commenters suggested that ``adverseaction'' be further defined, no other examples of ``adverse action'' weresubmitted, and FCA does not believe that any further examples are necessary.Regarding FCCA's comment suggesting insertion of ``only if'', FCA believesthat the wording of the regulation is clear. However, FCA has underlinedthe word ``and'' for purposes of emphasis. Section 614.4515 Restructuring policy and reporting. Section 614.4515(a)Restructuring policy. Comments were submitted requesting that the regulations impose conformityamong the lenders by setting forth in detail the form and content of thepolicies and that FCA review the policies. At a minimum, FCA was urgedto offer guidance on the content of the policies. One individual commentedthat FCA needs to ensure that the policies establish guidelines which willkeep costs down and prevent unnecessary paperwork and other burdens thatmay hinder institutions' competition with other financial lenders. Finally,one comment suggested that the policy and all related information shouldbe submitted to the borrower before the submission of his restructuringplan. As stated above in the discussion under the general comments, FCA willnot micromanage institutions by prescribing every detail that must be includedin the policies. FCA has required in andSection; 614.4515(a)(1) that thepolicy be adopted under andSection; 4.14A(g), and pursuant to this section,the policies have been submitted to FCA. However, the statute does notgive FCA approval authority, as requested by one commenter. In fact, Congressinitially gave FCA approval authority over the policies, and later deletedthis provision from the language of the Act. Thus, FCA does not believethat Congress intended for the agency to prescribe the specific contentof the policies. In response to the comment that requested the policy andall related materials be sent to the borrower before submission of a restructuringplan, andSection; 614.4516 requires that this be done. A Congressman alleged that borrowers who are not delinquent, but neverthelessare ``distressed'' are being sent restructuring applications and even thoughthese borrowers are current, institutions are using the distressed statusas a means of foreclosing on current borrowers. The commenter suggestedthat this is contrary to the intent of the Act. There is a section of theAct specifically addressing those borrowers who meet all loan obligations.If there have been violations of the law or regulation, FCA will addressthese problems through its examination, supervisory and other authorities,as appropriate. One individual commented that lenders should be willing to provide creditto effectuate restructurings. However, in some instances this may not constitutesafe and sound lending practices. In any event, FCA does not believe thatit should dictate to lenders or borrowers how loans should be restructured.This decision will be made by each lender on a case-by-case basis afterconsidering material submitted by the borrower. As long as the lender followsthe guidelines and requirements set out by safe and sound practices, statuteand regulation, the method which accomplishes the restructuring is withindiscretion of the lender. A farm group suggested that FCA should require institutions to update theirpolicies, particularly if a lender's semiannual reports indicate that therehave been fewer restructurings as compared to other institutions. As statedin the preamble to the proposed regulations, FCA anticipates that institutionswill update their policies as the restructuring process becomes more familiarto them. However, FCA does not see a need to require revisions to the policiesat this early stage. Section 614.4515(b) Semiannual reports. One comment suggested that no foreclosures or denials of any applicationsbe permitted until the institutions comply with andSection; 614.4515(b).Another comment suggested that the initial report to FCA on loans eligiblefor restructuring should serve as a benchmark before any restructuringsare completed. However, if adopted, these suggestions would be contraryto law. The new provisions of the Act were effective as of January 6, 1988,unless stated otherwise.A farmers group commented that the reports should contain the dispositionof the restructuring applications, and of appeals to the credit reviewcommittees. System institutions requested guidance on whether the reportsshould be based on month-end figures, as opposed to daily average balancefigures and also questioned when a loan is no longer considered ``distressed''for the purposes of the reports. The initial reports were to have beenfiled before these final regulations could be published. After FCA hashad the opportunity to review and analyze at least the first set of reports,it will be better able to specify the required content in more detail.In accordance with an FCA bookletter, the first report was to be filedno later than August 31, 1988. After analyzing those reports, FCA willadvise institutions of the future scheduling for filing the reports. Section 614.4516 Restructuring procedures. A number of comments from borrower and farm groups suggested that moreinformation be sent to the borrower along with the notice. Comments submittedsuggested that detailed information (such as a standard formula used forcalculating holding costs, the minimal interest rate that the lender willconsider) and all calculations should be provided to the borrower at orprior to the meeting so that the borrower is better able to submit a restructuringapplication. Commenters asserted that borrowers are uninformed as to whatconstitutes an adequate application, unless the lenders are able to offersome guidance. As discussed in andSection; 614.4440(c), FCA agrees that theremust be communications between borrower and lender during the restructuringprocess. However, FCA also believes that it is impossible to provide aspecific list of information in the regulation that must be consideredby the lender in making its determination. This will vary by loan, restructuringplan, location and other factors. It was suggested that lenders send an application for restructuring alongwith the notice. Comments suggested that the lender should offer help tothe borrower in filling out forms and that the notice should contain moredirection on how to present a restructuring plan and what information needsto be provided by the borrower. This paragraph requires that the lendersend all materials necessary to enable the borrower to submit an application,and these forms may include an application. However, to require the lendersto assist the borrower in submitting restructuring plans would place unreasonablecosts on the System and may create potential liability for the lender bypossibly compromising the loan contract. A borrower must take responsibilityfor submitting his own initial plan and application. The lender is requiredby andSection; 614.4516(a)(2) to provide borrowers with all materials necessaryto enable the borrower to submit an application. Furthermore, when a lenderdoes not have enough information to make a sound credit decision, the lendermust contact the borrower to obtain such information. However, a lendercannot provide a specific list of ``required information'' because thismay be different in each case. Many comments were received concerning the ``preliminary plan.'' Commentssuggested that the notice should state that the plan is preliminary andexplain what constitutes a preliminary plan, and state that the plan maybe further refined in discussions with the loan officer. Comments alsosuggested that the notice should define restructuring and what happensif a borrower does not respond. The purpose of a notice is to briefly andsuccinctly notify a borrower of important rights that are available tohim. A notice is not intended to inform a borrower as to entire processes.While lenders may opt to include more information in the notice, FCA believesthat the notice is adequate. The notice must be provided along with a copyof the restructuring policy which must include an explanation of the procedurefor submitting an application, pursuant to andSection; 614.4516(a)(1) andsection 4.14A(g) of the statute. Thus, the policy that is sent with thenotice will serve the purpose of informing a borrower of his right to submita preliminary plan. In response to these comments requesting that the noticeinform borrowers that the alternative to restructuring is foreclosure,FCA agrees and has revised the regulation accordingly. Commenters questioned whether the borrower must submit a preliminary planprior to or after the meeting with the lender. Comments were submittedexpressing both views on this issue. Since lenders and borrowers seem toprefer both options, and FCA believes that both approaches may be beneficial,the proposed regulation has not been changed to specify when the plan mustbe submitted in relation to the meeting. One comment suggested that the borrower have the opportunity to meet withan individual other than the loan officer in the event of a personalityconflict with the officer. FCA does not believe that the regulations shouldbe rewritten to accommodate personality problems that may exist betweenborrower and loan officer. This would place an unrealistic burden on thelender, since some institution offices only have one loan officer available.Furthermore, borrowers who feel they have been denied a fair review oftheir restructuring application have recourse to the credit review committee.One comment stated that the loan officer should be required to inform theborrower orally that the restructuring request must be in writing. FCAagrees that the borrower must be informed that the application must bein writing. However, FCA does not believe that the regulation must statethat a borrower be informed orally, since the regulation requires thatthe lender's notification include with it ``all materials necessary toenable the borrower to submit an application for restructuring.'' Thus,the borrower will be informed of this fact. Comments suggested that the notice be sent certified mail and that thenotice, policy, and materials, should be sent to all primary obligors andtheir attorneys. The borrower is protected by the requirement that thenotice be sent no later than 45 days before foreclosure proceedings begin.Thus, it does not matter how the notice is sent and FCA will not requirethe lenders to use certified mailings. However, FCA expects that the lendermay choose to use certified mail as a practical means of ensuring thatthe notice has been timely provided to the borrower. For the reasons discussedin andSection; 614.4367(e), FCA will not require the lenders to send thenotice to all primary obligors. If a borrower wants the notice to be sentto his attorney, all the borrower has to do is notify the lender of this.A lender should comply with this request since notification to a primaryobligor's attorney complies with the regulatory requirement of notificationto the primary obligor. Comments were submitted that suggested that the regulation require thelender to submit a counterproposal when the borrower's initial plan wasnot acceptable and state the reasons for rejection of the initial plan.FCA does not agree that counterproposals should always be required. Asexplained in andSection; 614.4440(c), the lender and borrower must work togetheruntil the lender has sufficient information to support a sound credit decision.Thus to the extent that a counterproposal would offer reasons for rejectionof the initial plan and explains to the borrower the flaws in his initialplan, the regulation effectively serves this purpose, as required by andSection;andSection;614.4440(c) and 614.4512(a). FCCA suggested that ``under this section'' be inserted in paragraph (b)following ``has been sent'' for purposes of clarity and that paragraph(c) be revised to track the statutory language in section 4.14A(d)(2) ofthe legislation. FCA disagrees with these suggestions. FCA believes thatparagraph (b) is clear as drafted. Although paragraph (c) is not inconsistentwith the statute, it cannot track the section in the statute word for wordbecause to do so would not make sense in the context of andSection; 614.4516.A few comments questioned what ``nonaccrual'' means. FCA refers these commentersto 12 CFR 621.2(a)(15). Section 614.4517 Restructuring decisions. Comments were submitted that expressed concern over the inequities createdby requiring ``good'' borrowers to repay their loans on the same termswhile other borrowers are entitled to repay under restructuring plans.On the other hand, some comments stated that lenders should give borrowersmore opportunities to restructure loans. While some comments requestedthat FCA specify more restructuring procedures and guidelines for the lenders,the opposite view that FCA should not micromanage lenders as they needflexibility to reach sound business decisions was also expressed. Again,FCA has attempted to strike a balance between these concerns.Comments were submitted requesting that the regulation be rewritten tobetter define the costs of restructuring and foreclosure, to provide betterguidance to the lenders on how to calculate these costs and what formulasshould be used by the lenders, and to provide all of this information includingworksheets, calculations, assumptions and formulas, to the borrower inthe early stages of the process (i.e., before a borrower applies for restructuring,or before a lender renders its determination). First, the cost of foreclosureis defined in andSection; 614.4512(c), and andSection; 614.4517 (a) and (c)addresses the cost of restructuring. FCA believes that these sections adequatelydefine these terms and address the factors that are a part of these definitions.The terms and definitions are those commonly used in the agricultural creditsector. Second, as stated earlier, in andSection;andSection; 614.4440(c), 614.4441(a),and 614.4512(c), no definitive cataloguing of assumptions, calculations,or formulas is possible, since the factors may very well differ in eachsituation. Thus, this information cannot be provided to the borrower atone of these earlier stages, because the specific information upon whichthe lender will base its decision will not be known until after each applicationis submitted. Section 614.4517(a) Consideration of application. Comments requested that terms such as ``necessary and reasonable livingand operating expenses'' and ``sound lending practices'' be defined. Onecommenter questioned whether sound lending practices are intended to keepthe farmer on the land and another commenter questioned whether they includeactions based on the determination of whether the cost of restructuringis less than the cost of foreclosure. FCA does not believe the regulationcan define and provide a nationwide standard for terms such as ``necessaryand reasonable living and operating expenses'' as they will differ dependingon the location, borrower, circumstances, and other factors. Similarly,``sound lending practices'' must be determined by examining each situationand the circumstances and factors surrounding each situation using generalcredit standards and safe and sound business practices. Comments suggested that any subjective information concerning a borrower'sskills, as discussed in andSection; 614.4517(a) (3) and (4), d (4), thatis used by the lender in its decision-making process should be made availableto the borrower so that the borrower is able to rebut this informationbefore the credit review committee. This information may include informationobtained from members of the borrower's community. This issue is discussedin andSection; 614.4518. FCA believes that lenders must take into account a borrower's prior restructurings,if any, on the loan that is presently the subject of the restructuringapplication and the regulation has been revised accordingly. The borrower'spayments on prior restructurings of the loan is an important factor thatwill help the lender assess whether the borrower is capable of workingout existing financial difficulties. If lenders allow multiple restructuringsregardless of past history on the same loan, then a borrower has the incentiveto seek successive restructurings to eventually eliminate his obligationsand borrowers who are meeting their loan obligations, including those involvedin restructurings, will be unjustly required to pay for these additionalcosts to the System lenders. Section 614.4517(a)(1) Evaluation of cost of restructuring. Comments requested that FCA define ``present value of interest and principalforegone'', ``preliminary restructuring plan'', ``reasonable and necessaryadministrative expenses'', and ``in a form acceptable to the institution.''Another comment stated that the ``administrative expenses'' must be reasonableso that a lender cannot unjustifiably increase these costs, so that thecost of restructuring will most likely be greater than the cost of foreclosure.One comment suggested that in evaluating the cost of restructuring, anappraisal must contain correct information and apply to the specific propertyunder consideration. Another commenter indicated that the appraisal shouldbe the lowest of any for which the borrower has paid. One comment suggested that in evaluating its cost of restructuring, thelender should also consider the following: The cost of insurance for absenteeownership, ad valorem taxes, the loss of income from property, damage sustainedby leaving property unoccupied, the decline in land prices caused by largeinstitutional inventories, cost of marketing and advertising property forsale and the lender's overhead. One comment suggested that in evaluatingthe restructuring cost the lender should be required to offer the lowestinterest rate to the borrower that it offers to its best customers andthat 30-year loans should be available. FCCA suggested that in the firstsentence of this paragraph, ``a restructuring plan'' be deleted and replacedwith ``restructuring a distressed loan'' to conform to the language foundin section 4.14 A(e)(2) of the statute. Finally, one commenter suggestedthat either the definition of cost of foreclosure found in andSection; 614.4512(c)be placed in this section, or the evaluation of cost of restructuring foundin paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 614.4517 be moved to andSection; 614.4512.FCA believes that the present value of interest income and principal foregonewill vary based on the lender's interest rate, debt adjustment, and otherfactors. A ``preliminary restructuring plan'' is defined in andSection;andSection;614.4440(c) and 614.4512(a) as being part of an application for restructuringand FCA believes that no further definition is required. As stated earlier,``reasonable and necessary administrative expenses'' will vary dependingon the situation as will information that is ``in a form acceptable tothe institution.'' FCA agrees that a lender cannot unjustifiably increasethe administrative costs to ensure that foreclosure will be less costlythan restructuring. Thus, the regulation speaks of reasonable, as wellas necessary costs. FCA agrees that the appraisal must contain correctinformation and be performed on the appropriate piece of property. No suggestedchanges to the proposed regulation were offered on this point, and FCAbelieves none are needed since the regulations adequately provide for this.FCA disagrees with the comment that the appraisal should be the lowestone. Where an appraisal is appropriate, section 4.14(d)(2) of the statutegives the borrower the opportunity to ``select <T3>an </T3>appraiser.'' Thus, the borrower cannot continue to employ appraisersuntil he gets an appraisal that he likes. Regarding the costs of restructuring, section 4.14A(e)(2) states that alender shall consider ``all <T3>relevant </T3>factors'' including a list of items that the statuteprovides. The items that the commenter named may or may not be relevantin every case. Thus, FCA is not willing to prescribe them in the regulation.However, to the extent that they are ``relevant factors'', they must beconsidered by the lender. In response to the comment that asserted thatthe lender should be required to offer the lowest interest rate to theborrower for a 30-year loan, FCA disagrees that it should dictate specificloan terms to a lender. These are business decisions that must be madeby the lender, not FCA. FCA has changed the statutory language in the firstsentence of the paragraph based on the suggestion by FCCA. This revisionis important in order to differentiate between a preliminary restructuringplan and a restructuring application. FCA does not believe it is necessaryto move the definition of ``cost of foreclosure'' or the cost factors ofrestructuring, since the definitions found in andSection; 614.4512 are applicableto the entire subpart. However, FCA has transferred the factors to be consideredwhen determining whether to restructure from paragraph (c) to paragraph(a)(1). Section 614.4517(b) Required restructuring. Comments stated that there is no incentive for lenders to restructure ifthe decision is based solely on cost. Another comment stated that if thecost of restructuring, must be less than the cost of foreclosure beforea lender is required to restructure, the ``middle'' borrower will not havemuch of an opportunity to have his loan restructured. Section 4.14A(e)(1)of the statute specifically states when a lender is required to restructureand FCA cannot alter the statutory language. One comment stated that ``the least cost to the lender'' should be definedand another comment suggested that it be defined using criteria prescribedby section 4.14A of the 1987 Act. FCA believes that the regulation alreadydefines this term in accordance with the statute. Even though two or morealternatives are available to lenders, they will still have to considerthe costs of those plans as prescribed by the regulation in paragraph (a)of 614.4517, which tracks the language of section 4.14A (d) and (e)(2)of the statute.Section 614.4518 Notice of denial of restructuring and right to review.There were a number of comments addressing a borrower's access to informationupon which a lender's denial of the restructuring application was based.All comments indicated that the borrower is entitled to information thatfactored into the lender's decision. However, there were differences ofopinion as to how much information and the mechanism under which it shouldbe provided. Comments from individuals and farm groups requested that more informationbe provided to support and explain the reasons for the denial of the restructuringapplication. Comments from other groups and individuals also expressedconcern that the regulations ensure that full documentation of the reasonsfor denial is made available to borrowers under a uniform procedure. Onecommenter suggested that the following language be added to paragraph (c):``including full documentation of the lender's calculations of the costof restructuring and the cost of foreclosure.'' The comments advocatedthat the regulation should require that the lender provide specific reasonsfor the denial, including any actual calculations; assumptions used; documentationto explain why the cost of restructuring would be greater than the costof foreclosure using formulas that considered specific suggested factors;all figures and formulas used, such as interest rates, administrative costs,and family living costs as assumed by the lender; in short all informationrelied on or used by the lender in reaching its decision. Comments statedthat this information need only be provided when the application is denied.It was asserted that without all of this information, a borrower cannoteasily decide whether he would want to request a review before the creditreview committee. Furthermore, comments stated that if a borrower decidesto request a review, he cannot challenge the assumptions upon which thedecision was made without such information. Farmer and borrower groupsasserted that merely providing a contact person to provide such information,as the proposed regulation requires, is not sufficient. Since a borroweronly has 7 days in which to request an appeal, this information shouldbe provided in the notice to enable the borrower to review the informationand decide within that 7-day period whether he wants to request a review.If a borrower has to contact an individual to obtain the information, itwill leave little time of the 7 days that is left to examine the informationand decide whether to request a review. FCCA agrees with the position that FCA took in its preamble to the proposedregulations. Namely, FCCA asserts that some of the critical assumptionsand other relevant information used by the lender in making its decisioncould be helpful to a borrower in deciding whether to request a review.However, such information should not be routinely provided as part of thenotice of denial. Rather, the notice should specify whom the borrower shouldcontact to obtain such information and indicate that such information willbe furnished upon written request. FCCA further comments that the regulationsshould also provide that upon the written request of a borrower whose restructuringapplication has been denied, the lender shall furnish, in writing, thecritical assumptions and other relevant calculations or information, whethermonetary or non-monetary, upon which the lender based its decision to denyrestructuring. The regulations should also make clear that where the lenderhas based its denial on non-monetary consideration, the lender is onlyrequired to specify those considerations and furnish that information whichplayed a material role in its decision. In further explaining this viewpoint,one lender asserted that an institution's decision not to restructure isnot strictly quantifiable. Oftentimes it is based on ``intangibles,'' suchas the borrower's efforts to cooperate, his ability to produce, and thelike. The lender also indicated that disclosure of information even asrequired by the proposed regulation would change the negotiation processbetween lender and borrower into ``one of arbitraging outcomes_on one sidehypothetical costs based on past and anticipated future experience, opinions,and strategies; on the other, opposing opinion motivated by the desireto achieve a more favorable financial outcome.'' FCA has considered all viewpoints and balanced the borrower's right toa meaningful review before the credit review committee against a lender'sright to negotiate with current and prospective borrowers. FCA notes thatcertain relevant information, in addition to the reasons for the lender'sdecision, should be provided to ensure that a borrower has the right toa meaningful credit review. Regarding what information should be provided,FCA does not believe that <T3>all </T3>information must be provided to the borrower. First, FCA realizesthat some denials will be based on subjective judgment as opposed to quantifiablefactors. Thus, some borrowers will be provided with figures and calculations,while others will be informed that they are not capable of repaying theloan and provided quantifiable, as well as the nonquantifiable reasonsfor reaching such a conclusion. While FCA believes that a borrower is entitledto the reasons for the decision and the bases for those reasons to enablehim to decide whether to appeal and so that the borrower is entitled toa meaningful review, FCA does not believe that a lender must disclose everypiece of information and all of its calculations so that a lender willbe unable to effectively negotiate with borrowers or compete with otherfinancial institutions. Thus, FCA has required that critical assumptionsand relevant information be provided. Enough information must be providedto ensure that a borrower understands the reasons for a lender's decision,to provide him a basis to decide whether to appeal and to provide him witha meaningful review process. Where a lender is bound by confidentialityrestraints, it obviously cannot disclose this information. Thus, the regulationis revised to incorporate the above considerations.Regarding the process for supplying information, this section will differfrom andSection; 614.4441 regarding adverse credit decisions. Unlike andSection;614.4441 which provides a borrower with 30 days in which to request a review,an applicant for restructuring only has 7 days. Thus, FCA believes thatunlike andSection; 614.4441, the lender must automatically provide the relevantinformation under this section, when denying a restructuring applicationto the applicant without first requiring that an applicant request suchinformation. This will ensure that an applicant is able to decide withinthat 7-day period whether he wishes to request a review and will also givea borrower an opportunity to begin preparation for the credit review. Additional comments were received concerning the contents of the notice.One commenter stated that the notice should be ``clear'' without specifyinghow the notice was vague. One commenter stated that the notice should includeinformation on the documentation that a borrower can provide to the creditreview committee. Other comments requested that the notice should includeinformation on the appraisal, that the notice should include informationon the appraisal only where additional collateral is required, that thenotice should inform the borrower of any State mediation programs priorto the denial, that a separate form to request a credit review should besent to the borrower, and that ``7 days'' should be in bold print and conspicuouslyplaced in the notice. FCA agrees with some of these suggestions. Notification is not intendedto prescribe every right or every procedure available to the borrower.However, the notice requirements are intended to inform a borrower thatcertain rights to appeal the denial of a restructuring application areavailable to him as provided by the 1987 Act. For these reasons, FOA agreesthat a borrower should be notified of his right to an appraisal when additionalcollateral is demanded by the lender in a restructuring context, but disagreeswith the other proposed notifications. With the changes to the proposedregulation, FCA believes that the notification to borrowers is clear andthat the notice requirements set forth in the regulation are adequate.In response to the comment that 7 days should be in bold print, FCA believesthat the form of the notice is within the lender's discretion, but FCAsuggests that the lender should give that prominence. Comments were submitted concerning the manner in which the notice shouldbe sent. Some commenters expressed the opinion that the notice should besent by certified mail to all primary obligors and their attorneys andthat the 7-day time limit in which a borrower must request an appeal beextended when the notice is sent to a ``third party'', such as an attorney.Also, other comments suggested that the 7-day period was too short, regardlessof the recipient, and in any event the 7 days should start to run fromthe date that the notice is received. One comment said that the noticeshould be sent to the ``proponent'' of the restructuring plan. FCA agrees that the notice sent pursuant to this section must be sent bycertified mail or in any other manner that will allow for acknowledgmentof receipt. Although FCA has not required this of the notices discussedabove, since a borrower only has 7 days from receipt in which to requesta review of a denial of a restructuring application, FCA believes thatit is appropriate to require a lender to use certified mail or other appropriatemeans to ensure that a borrower is timely notified in order to exercisehis rights if he chooses. FCA believes that timely notification is particularlyimportant in this instance, since the 7-day period is much shorter thanthe 30-day period. In response to those comments that stated that the 7-dayperiod in which to request a review was too short, the statute prescribesthis time limit, and the regulation conforms with the statutory requirement.FCA does not believe that the regulation needs to be revised to state thatthe 7-day period begins from receipt since paragraph (c) of andSection; 614.4518makes this clear. In response to the comment that the notice should besent to the ``proponent'' of the plan, FCA believes that the notice requirementmay be fulfilled by sending the notice to a primary obligor. However, lendersshould attempt to send the notice to the primary obligor with whom thelender has been dealing in regard to the restructuring application. One comment stated that the lender should be given a deadline in whichto reach its decision since the borrower for all intents and purposes,has 45 days in which to apply for restructuring and one comment suggestedthat the following language be added to the end of paragraph (c) to givea borrower adequate time in which to prepare for a credit review beforethe committee: ``and the borrower, upon request, shall be allowed up to30 days in which to prepare for such review.'' The time in which it takes to make a determination will vary dependingon such factors as the complexity of the particular restructuring planand the number of restructuring applications at the institution. Therefore,FCA does not believe that the lender should be instructed to reach a decisionwithin a prescribed period of time. Furthermore, there is no incentivefor a lender to delay making its decision, since it is not in a lender'sbest interest to allow a distressed loan to remain on its books for a longperiod of time without some form of corrective action. Similarly, FCA doesnot believe that it should prescribe a time limit in which the borrowerhas to prepare for the review. As discussed in andSection; 614.4442(d), areasonable time period must be allowed. However, FCA does not believe itis appropriate to prescribe a fixed time period in which to prepare forthe review since the preparation time that is needed will depend on thecomplexity of the reasons for denial, supporting information, and otherfactors. Section 614.4519 Notice before foreclosure; limitation on foreclosure andSection 614.4519(a) Notice requirements. Comments were submitted requesting that more information be included inthe notice. One comment stated that the lender should be required to explainthe procedural steps taken before and after restructuring applicationsare considered. One comment suggested that the borrower be notified ofhis right to an appraisal. Another comment requested that the notice shouldclearly state that foreclosure is being contemplated and that the lendershould be required to notify the borrower of the timeframes involved. Thenotice is intended to be a notification that foreclosure may be imminent,and that the borrower has the right to submit a restructuring application.It is not intended to be an extensive explanation of the process. For thesereasons, FCA disagrees with the suggestions that the notice include theprocedural steps, timeliness, and the right to an appraisal. However, FCAagrees that the notice should inform borrowers that foreclosure may beimminent and this section as well as andSection; 614.4516(a) have been revisedaccordingly. Section 614.4519(b) Limitation of foreclosure. There were a number of comments requesting that FCA place more limits ona lender's ability to foreclose. One comment stated that the regulationshould clarify that foreclosure may not be initiated until a lender hascompleted any consideration of a restructuring application, including areview by the credit review committee. Comments suggested that foreclosurenot be permitted until all restructuring attempts and processes are exhausted,including a decision by the SAG, a review by the National Council, andan appeal to the FCA for a directive. One comment suggested that a lendernot be allowed to begin foreclosure proceedings until 45 days after itsdecision on a restructuring application. Other comments suggested thatno foreclosure be initiated until after 45 days has passed during whicha borrower has not responded, and notice of loan acceleration has beensent to a borrower providing an additional 30 days in which to pay. Onecomment asserted that the regulation is broader than the statute in thatit allowed more foreclosures than the statute did. Unfortunately, thiscommenter did not specify how he interpreted the regulation to be broader.FCCA found it to be narrower in that FCCA alleged that the regulation limitsthe lender's ability to foreclose in certain situations (i.e., during considerationby a credit review committee). FCA agrees that foreclosure may not be initiated during the credit reviewprocess. In response to FCCA's comment, the regulation does prohibit thelender from initiating, continuing or completing a foreclosure proceedingpending the completion of the credit review committee process. FCA believesthat without this provision, the credit review committee process wouldbe meaningless and borrowers would be deprived of their right to a fairreview. On the other hand, even though a lender must wait until the committeeprocess is complete, since the committee must render its decision in asexpeditious a manner as possible, FCA does not believe that lenders aredeprived of their right to a timely foreclosure where appropriate. Foreclosuremay be initiated after the credit review process, but must be halted ifa SAG requires restructuring. Thus, a lender will have the incentive tobegin foreclosure only when it believes it is on very firm ground regardingits decision to foreclose. The borrower is not prejudiced in any way aslong as foreclosure does not occur until after the credit review committeehas completed its consideration. Thus FCA has balanced both the interestsof a borrower to a meaningful credit review and the interests of a lenderto timely foreclosure in determining this approach.The last sentence in this paragraph has been revised to conform to thestatutory language found in andSection; 4.14A(j) to provide the lender withthe opportunity to take action where it has reasonable grounds to believethat loan collateral may be destroyed. Section 614.4519(c) Limitation on foreclosure_special asset group determination.One comment suggested that the following language be inserted into andSection;614.4519(c): ``No foreclosure proceedings may begin until all possibleappeals and restructuring actions have been completed.'' As discussed inthe immediately preceding paragraph, the regulation balances both the borrower'srights and those of the lender. Therefore, FCA does not agree that thissection should be revised as suggested. Another comment questioned what would happen if a SAG decided that a loanshould be restructured, but the decision had previously been made by alender not to restructure and foreclosure was already complete. FCA doesnot expect this situation will exist. A certified lender's SAG is to reviewonly those determinations where a restructuring plan has been denied. Thus,unlike the credit review committee, the SAGs are established for a morelimited purpose and they should be able to better perform timely reviews.Furthermore, the usual foreclosure process is a lengthy one. Thus, in thetime that it takes a lender to complete this process, SAGs should be ableto perform their reviews in a timely fashion. Section 614.4520 Review of restructurings for certified institutions; reporting.Comments suggested a borrower should be able to submit information to theSAG and the National Special Asset Council (National Council) and thattheir determinations should be disclosed and made available to borrowersand other interested parties. Comments also suggested that procedures forthe SAG and National Council should be set forth in the regulations. FCAdoes not believe that the regulations should require that borrowers orthird parties have direct access to the SAGs or the National Council sincethe statute does not provide for this. Furthermore, FCA does not agreethat it should prescribe procedures for the Council and the SAGs. The proceduresare more appropriately established by the SAGs and the National Council.Also, the Farm Credit System Assistance Board, and not FCA regulates theNational Council. One comment stated that the SAGs should review all denials of restructuringapplications. Another comment questioned whether an institution in receivershipwould be able to work with the former institution's board of directorsto establish a SAG. Finally, FCCA commented that andSection; 614.4520(g)should refer to andSection; 614.45l7(a) to conform to the statutory languageand to clarify the factors that these entities are to consider when reviewingdecisions. Paragraph (b) of andSection; 614.4520 already requires the SAGs to reviewall restructuring denials. In response to the comment on receiverships,as has been proviously stated in this preamble, FCA will make these determinationsapplicable to each individual receivership when or after a receivershipis established. As FCCA indicated, the regulation will refer to paragraph(a) of andSection; 614.4517.  Section 614.4521 Participation in state agricultural loan mediation programs. Comments were submitted on the effect, if any, that mediation should haveon the foreclosure process. Comments suggested that borrowers who requestmediation should be allowed to participate <T3>before </T3>they participate in the restructuring process. Other commentsstated that mediation should occur during the preliminary restructuringphase, before the 45-day period referenced in andSection; 614.4519 begins,and during the 45-day period. Additional comments expressed the view thatforeclosure proceedings should be stayed any time mediation is initiated.On the other hand, one comment stated that mediation is no longer appropriateafter a lender has rendered a final decision on foreclosure. FCA has specified that mediation may occur either concurrently with loanrestructuring or at any other appropriate time. As long as lenders participatein those mediation programs certified under section 501 of the 1987 Actso that borrowers are able to take full advantage of their mediation rights,FCA does not believe it is appropriate for the regulations to further restricta lender's foreclosure rights by requiring that the foreclosure processbe stayed or not initiated during mediation, as long as State law doesnot dictate otherwise. Other comments focused on the lender's participation in mediation. Onecomment suggested that in mandatory mediation States, institutions shouldinitiate the mediation process. Another comment suggested that institutionsbe required to participate in good faith regardless of who initiates themediation. One comment suggested that in voluntary mediation States, aninstitution should be required to participate even if another lender, notthe borrower, requests mediation. Finally, one citizens' group advocatedthat the FCA establish a policy that would require all System institutionsto participate in State mediation programs. If a mediation program permitsa lender to initiate mediation, it may do so as determined by the lender'sown discretion. However, FCA believes that participation in State mediationprograms, other than those specified in section 503(b) of the 1987 Act,is governed by the applicable State law. Even those certified programswill vary by State. Thus, FCA has declined to set further requirementsfor institutions' participation. Regarding the comment suggesting thatthe lender participate in mediation when initiated by a third party, althoughFCA has not prescribed this participation in the regulations, lenders maywant to consider such participation to protect their interests especiallywhen the lender is not a first lien holder. Comments suggested that the institutions notify borrowers of their rightsunder mediation and in this notification provide timeframes so that a borrowerwill be able to take advantage of mediation before any determination ona restructuring application is final. One comment suggested that all noticessent out under the borrower rights regulations should inform borrowersof the applicable mediation rights and that the regulations should outlinethe necessary requirements or credentials for a mediator. Another commentstated that FCA should specify processes for mediation. FCA does not believethat the notices of disclosure, loan or restructuring application, or firstrefusal rights prescribed by these borrower rights provisions are the appropriatevehicle to notify borrowers of their mediation rights. Nor does FCA believethat its regulations should require institutions to notify borrowers oftheir mediation rights since some locations may not have mediation availableto borrowers, and those that do will vary greatly. The appropriate vehiclefor the suggested notification may very well exist in the mediation programsthemselves. Furthermore, FCA believes that any integration between themediation process and the borrower rights processes is better left to theinstitutions themselves, as may be prescribed by any State mediation programor State law. Comments suggested that the FCA explain the requirements for certificationunder section 503(b) of the 1987 Act. FCCA indicated that the final regulationshould refer to section 501 of the 1987 Act, instead of section 503(b)as the proposed regulation does. FCCA suggested that ``consideration''be inserted before ``loan restructuring'' for clarity and that ``underthe same terms and conditions applicable to agricultural creditors generally''be inserted immediately following the reference to the 1987 Act to conformto FmHA's proposed regulations. FCCA also recommended that ``To the extentpermitted by Part 618, Subpart G, of these regulations'' be inserted atthe beginning of the paragraph (b) to remove any potential conflict. In response to the comment requesting that the requirements of certificationbe contained in the notice, FCA believes that the borrowers rights regulationsare not the appropriate place to expound on the requirements for certification.FCA refers this commenter to section 501 of the 1987 Act, codified at 7U.S.C. 5101 which addresses this issue. FCA concurs with FCCA's suggestionthat section 501, as opposed to section 503(b) is the appropriate citation,and the regulation will be revised accordingly. FCA agrees that inserting``consideration of'' would clarify the regulation and the final regulationwill be revised accordingly. However, FCA declines to make the other twochanges suggested by the FCCA. FCA is not convinced that terms and conditionsapplicable to other agricultural creditors should also be applicable tothe System institutions. Regarding a potential conflict with Subpart Gof Part 618, FCA has addressed this issue in Subpart G by requiring thatinstitutions provide such information, with the borrower's permission,to comply with paragraph (b) and the requirements of section 503 of the1987 Act.Section 614.4522 Right of first refusal. In general, comments were submitted by borrowers groups and individualsindicating that FCA should grant more rights to previous owners to helpensure that an individual can remain on his land. On the other hand, commentswere received from lenders, as well as borrowers expressing concern overthe costs and harm to the System created by the rights of first refusal.FCA has balanced these interests in drafting the regulation. There were a number of comments focusing on the public auction paragraphof the regulation and its interaction with the remainder of the paragraphsin the regulation. Specifically, many commenters expressed divergent viewson whether the Act prohibits a System institution from selling or leasingacquired property through a public auction pursuant to paragraph (e), withoutfirst providing first refusal rights under paragraph (c) or (d). Many individualsand farmer groups expressed the view that the regulation should not allowfor a public auction as set forth in paragraph (e), unless the institutionhas first gone through the first refusal process in a private sale or leaseas prescribed by paragraph (c) or (d). The reasons for this view were many.One commenter stated that since there is no ``notice period'' providedin paragraph (e) which would allow a previous owner to arrange for financing,Congress must have intended an institution to first follow the steps inparagraphs (c) and (d) which do have such a ``notice period.'' Other commentersstated that Congressional intent dictates this position. It was furtherasserted that Congress intended to provide first refusal rights to previousowners and that providing the previous owner with notice and opportunityto bid at public auction and requiring an institution to accept the bidof the previous owner if it is a qualified bid that matches the highestoffer should not be considered to be a ``right of first refusal.'' Finally,some commenters proposed that FCA should follow the recent district courtdecisions, both of which are on appeal, in <T3>Leckband </T3>v.<T3> Naylor, </T3>Civ. No. 3-88-167, (D. Minn., May 17, 1988); and <T3>Martinson </T3>v. <T3>Federal Land Bank of St. Paul, </T3>Civ. No., A2-88-31 (D.N.D., April21, 1988), which held that based on the legislative history, System institutionsimproperly used the public auction process because they did not first affordprevious owners their rights of first refusal as prescribed by either paragraph(c) or (d). Some farmers and other individual commenters agreed with the approach thatthe FCA took in the proposed regulation for various reasons. One commenterstated that by providing otherwise and following the <T3>Leckband </T3>approach, FCA would be eliminating opportunities forviable parties to buy property. Also, this commenter expressed concernover the excessive costs to the System if institutions are not allowedto sell land through public auction. Some commenters stated that by allowingthe previous owner ``two bites of the apple'', the price of agriculturalreal estate will be deflated. One lender discussed several instances whereproperty was purchased by a previous owner pursuant to paragraph (c), andthen immediately resold at a higher price. The lender asserted that these``flip sales'' do not keep the previous owner on the land, as was the intentof Congress. In addition, the commenter asserted that the institutionshave already spent their resources, both in time and money finding potentialbuyers. These ``flip sales'' negate the competitive bidding process whichif operated freely would help to strengthen agricultural land values. Onelegal aid group expressed a preference for public auctions because theyare supervised by sheriff's offices. Thus, an institution is less ableto violate the borrower rights provisions. One commenter complained thatby affording multiple and subsequent first refusal rights, third partypurchasers will suffer. FCCA states that nothing in the legislative history or the actual languageof the 1987 Act requires that a private sale be held prior to a publicauction. Congress only intended that the previous owner be given a reasonableopportunity to repurchase the property before it is sold to a third party.This can be accomplished by either the private sale provision or the publicauction provision. FCCA asserts that paragraph (a) sets forth the <T3>general </T3>rule that acquired property is subject to the right offirst refusal. Paragraphs (b) through (d) set forth procedures to implementthe general rule in various situations. FCCA further asserts that the legislativedebate, particularly in the Senate Subcommittee on Agricultural Creditof the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Nutrition, and Forestry that authoredthe language on first refusal rights eventually adopted by Congress, confirmsthat Congress intended to create two independent, not sequential, rightsof first refusal. FCA believes that the language in the proposed regulation correctly reflectsthe intent of the Act. There are three rights of first refusal available,as stated in paragraphs (c), (d) and (e). Nothing in the legislative historypersuades FCA that these rights must be provided sequentially. The relevantlanguage originated in the Senate, where it was stated that ``the formerowner be given <T3>one </T3>opportunity to lease back or buy back his property.'' Theprevious owner is not prejudiced as long as he is afforded his right offirst refusal <T3>either </T3>in the public auction process <T3>or </T3>by private sale or lease. In both instances, the previous owneris given priority by the institution. However, the System would be prejudicedif an institution is required to provide these rights subsequent to eachother. An institution should be afforded the right to sell land publiclyor privately in order to get the best price in its judgment, dependingon market conditions. To deprive an institution of this right will harmnot only the lender, but the entire System and prices of agricultural realestate as well. FCA is mindful of the district court decisions, both ofwhich are on appeal. FCA will monitor the litigation closely and will,if appropriate, reconsider its position at a later time. Comments suggested that all decisions and denials under this section beappealable. One comment stated that the borrower should have an opportunityto submit evidence rebutting a lender's decision that the borrower didnot have resources available to conduct a successful farming or ranchingoperation, or that the borrower cannot meet all of the payments, termsand conditions of a lease, pursuant to paragraph (d)(2). One comment criticizedthe regulation for allowing these determinations to be made by the lender.Other individuals suggested that an independent appraisal be permitted.Comments also advocated that the lender disclose the purchase agreementto the borrower so that the borrower is assured that the lender is in compliancewith the regulation and statute. One comment requested that all decisions,reasons to reject or deny a right of first refusal, and a borrower's waiverof his rights be in writing. The suggestions for appeal rights, an opportunity to submit evidence, independentappraisals, written determinations on every decision, and disclosures wouldprovide for a process similar to the credit review committee process. However,the statute does not provide for the credit committee process to reviewthese denials. Instead it provides for first refusal rights in certainsituations to certain previous owners who, <T3>as determined by the lender </T3>(see section 4.36 (a) and (c)(3)),are eligible for these rights. There were a number of comments advocating that FCA create procedures forthe first refusal rights. A farm group suggested that the property mustbe in the lender's inventory a minimum amount of time before it is soldor leased to other than the previous owner unless the previous owner haswaived all his rights. Another comment stated that the regulation shouldprescribe a definite time period in which a lender must elect to sell theproperty. A comment from four State attorneys general advocated that thelegislative history indicates that the regulations should implement a ``homesteadprotection,'' i.e., if an institution holds property for an interim period,the institution should offer to lease the residence and other buildingsnecessary for family maintenance to the previous owner at fair market value;and if an institution decides to separate the residence from other propertyfor sale or lease, the institution should offer to sell or lease the residenceto the previous owner at fair market value. One commenter urged that theregulations require System institutions and State attorneys general toissue a statement on the interaction of State and Federal rights.FCA does not believe that the regulations should require that the acquiredproperty be in the lender's inventory for a period of time before saleor that the lender must decide to sell within a prescribed period of time.With restructuring, mediation, and other rights available to borrowers,foreclosure may be a very lengthy process. Additional time is requiredto implement either public or private disposition under andSection; 4.36of the Act, which adds to the length of the foreclosure process. Duringthis time, the loan is not accruing interest, and FCA does not believethat further time delays should be imposed on a lender. ln response tothe comment on ``homestead protection'' (as that term is used by the commenters),although institutions may make such offers to the previous owners underthe regulations, FCA does not believe that the regulations should requiresuch a protection. First, FCA must assume that if Congress had intendedfor such a protection to exist, the Act would have so provided. Second,FCA will not dictate such offers be made by an institution. This is a businessdecision to be made by the lender, not FCA, as an arm's length regulator.Regarding the comment suggesting that a joint policy statement on Stateand Federal rights be required, FCA believes that the interaction betweenState and Federal law is a matter for the courts to decide. Thus, FCA hasnot adopted this suggestion. Comments were submitted advocating further restraints on the lender' sability to sell the property and further setting restrictions as to whichoffer a lender may accept. Comments suggested that the method of financingshould be considered to be a term or condition of the sale, thus, advocatingthat the lender should not be permitted to offer below market or preferentialrates to a potential third party purchaser unless the lender is willingto offer the same terms to the previous owner. One comment suggested thatthe lender finance the previous owner if he can meet <T3>some </T3>terms and conditions as the lender would require of a thirdparty purchaser. A member of Congress commented that some previous ownersare apparently being informed that they must exercise their rights of firstrefusal through a cash purchase. The Congressman suggested that insteadof adopting such a policy, lenders should decide on a case-by-case basiswhether they will offer financing. This commenter also stated that someprevious owners are being informed that if they are not able to obtainfinancing, any further rights under andSection; 4.37 that they may have arenull and void. The member of Congress suggested that these statements becorrected by clarifying the regulations on these issues. In response to the comments advocating that lenders should finance or considerfinancing previous owners, the statute specifically states that ``financingby a System institution shall not be considered to be a term or conditionof a sale of acquired real estate.'' Thus, the decision to finance a previousowner is wholly within the lender' s discretion. In response to the Congressman'scomment concerning any further rights such as those set forth in andSection;4.36(b)(5), FCA does not believe the regulations need to be revised onthis point because they do not make these other provisions found in andSection;4.36, dependent on whether a borrower can finance his purchase. Many suggestions were offered, which, if complied with, would alter thefirst refusal rights as prescribed by statute. A farm counseling groupsuggested that if an institution receives a bid during a public auctionthat is below the appraised value of the property, the previous owner shouldbe made aware of the bid and given 30 days in which to match or exceedthe bid. One comment suggested that a previous owner have an exclusiveright to purchase the property for 15 days, and that after this time period,the offer should remain open until a new appraisal is performed (thus raisingthe mandatory acceptance price) or until the institution has entered intoa sales contract with a third party. FCA declines to revise the regulationas suggested above because to do so would alter the essence of the firstrefusal rights as prescribed by Congress. Other changes to the statute were suggested. One commenter suggested thatthe 15-day time periods be extended because of inefficient postal service.One comment stated that the regulation should specify 15 business days,instead of 15 days and that this period should be from receipt of the notice.Another commenter stated that the notices must be made clearer than thoseprescribed by the regulations. A lender suggested that the regulationsshould state that these rights cannot be sold, assigned or otherwise transferredby the previous owner. The FCCA suggested that ``previous owner'' be furtherdefined to ensure that the previous owner is the record owner of the realestate. FCCA asserted that the failure to do so may result in a borrowerwith no ownership interest in the acquired property seeking to exercisethe rights of first refusal and this would be contrary to the intent ofthe Act. The statute describes specific time periods, either 15 or 30 days, dependingon the actions involved, and FCA does not agree that the regulations shouldbe revised to contradict the Congressional intent which is evidenced bythe clear statutory language. Regarding the comment requesting that businessdays be prescribed, if Congress meant business days, as opposed to days,FCA must assume that the legislation would have been written accordingly.This commenter also requested that FCA prescribe 15 days <T3>from receipt </T3>of the notice. However, the regulation, where applicable,requires this. In response to the comment that stated that the notice wasunclear, FCA disagrees and believes that the contents of all notices areclearly spelled out in the regulation. In response to the lender's commentthat the regulations should specify that the rights cannot be transferred,FCA does not believe it is necessary to revise the regulations. They clearlystate that these rights are applicable only to previous owners. Institutionsneed not afford these rights to any other individuals. In response to FCCA'scomment on the definition of ``previous owner,'' FCA agrees that the Congressionalintent is to keep the record owner on the land, who in all cases may notbe the borrower. For example, there may be instances where parents havepledged their land as collateral for their son's loan. Even though theparents are not borrowers, FCA believes that they should have first refusalrights. Thus, FCA agrees and has changed the definition of previous ownerin the regulation. Changes were suggested based on the technical amendments bill, H.R. 3980.For example, one individual suggested that the time periods be changedto conform to H.R. 3980. FCCA suggested that ``former borrower'' in paragraph(f) be changed to ``previous owner.'' As stated previously, since the technicalamendments bill has passed, FCA has changed the regulations to conformto the statute. Comments were submitted on the requirement in paragraph (b) that the lenderdetermine and document whether the previous owner had the financial resourcesto avoid foreclosure before granting any first refusal rights. Commentersadvocated that even if borrowers had the financial resources to avoid foreclosure,they should still be allowed to exercise first refusal rights. FCCA suggestedthat ``loan foreclosure or'' be deleted from paragraph (b), thus deletingthe requirement that institutions must document that a borrower did nothave the ability to avoid foreclosure. FCCA asserts that the discussionin the Senate subcommittee mark-up which led to insertion of this requirementin paragraph (b) makes clear that the potential abuse which Congress soughtto avoid was limited to voluntary conveyances by borrowers who might otherwisetake advantage of the first refusal rights by deeding over their mortgagedproperty, the value of which is then considerably less than the debt againstit, and repurchasing such property clear of any encumbrances. FCCA furtheradvocated that institutions should not be required to determine whetherthe borrower had the financial resources to avoid foreclosure, as longas the institution routinely offers the previous owner his rights of firstrefusal in all cases where title is acquired by voluntary conveyance. FCA disagrees with these comments. The law clearly states that agriculturalreal estate is subject to rights of first refusal, <T3>only if </T3>the borrower did not have the resources to avoid foreclosure.This requirement is in the statute and in the regulation to prohibit thetype of transactions described by the FCCA and discussed by Congress. Furthermore,FCA believes that institutions should be required to make and documentthese determinations. In response to FCCA's comment that institutions neednot make this determination in loan foreclosure cases, FCA asserts thatif the borrower has gone through the restructuring, credit review committeeand foreclosure processes, institutions already would have made this determination.Thus, there is no burden on the institution in requiring such documentation,and such documentation may avoid potential abuses of the statute. FCA furtherdisagrees that institutions need not make these determinations in a voluntaryconveyance situation. It is even more important that these determinationsbe made when there has been a voluntary conveyance to avoid the potentialabuses discussed by FCCA.FCCA also suggested that ``to purchase the property'' be inserted after``offer'' in the last sentence of paragraph (c)(1) and that ``to leasethe property'' be inserted after ``offer'' in the last sentence of paragraph(d)(1) for clarity. FCCA commented that banks for cooperatives were notintended to be included in the regulation and to correct this error FCCAsuggested that ``(except a bank for cooperatives)'' be inserted immediatelyfollowing ``institution of the System'' in paragraph (a)(1). FCCA as wellas individual commenters suggested that ``or any portion of such real estate''be inserted in the first sentence of paragraph (c) to conform to the statute.Finally, FCCA commented that for clarity ``acquired real estate'' be replacedwith ``acquired property'' in paragraph (c)(4) and that in paragraph (d)(2)``rental'' be inserted after the word ``appraised.'' FCA does not agree that the terms ``to purchase the property'' and ``tolease the property'' are necessary for clarity. FCA agrees that the regulationmust be revised to exclude banks for cooperatives and a definition willbe included that exempts banks for cooperatives. FCA agrees with the remainderof the proposed changes and the regulation has been revised accordingly.Also, since the institution is the record owner of acquired property, thedefinition of previous owner has been changed to clarify that the previousowner was the prior record owner before the institution became the presentrecord owner. One comment suggested that a definition of ``accredited appraiser'' beincluded in the regulation. Another comment suggested a certain approachfor appraisers to follow. Finally, a legal aid organization questionedwhether after a right of first refusal is exercised, a lender could forecloseagain. No changes to the regulation based on these proposals will be madeat this time. Regulations addressing appraisals will be published in aseparate <T4>Federal Register </T4>document on eligibility and lending authorities.In response to the question concerning whether more than one foreclosureis possible after rights of first refusal have been exercised, as longas foreclosure is otherwise appropriate, FCA knows of no reason to prohibitsuch foreclosures. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 615_FUNDING AND FISCAL AFFAIRS, LOAN POLICIES AND OPERATIONS,AND FUNDING OPERATIONS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart J_Prescription, Subscription and Retirement of Stock </ITAG>Since paragraphs (e) through (g) of proposed andSection; 615.5255 relateto retirement of stock only in the context of restructuring, and not inthe context of default, the paragraphs will become a separate section whichwill be renumbered and retitled. Comments suggested that borrowers be allowedto retire stock against outstanding principal regardless of whether principalis reduced. FCA assumes that this comment refers to retirement of eligibleborrower stock. This will be addressed in a separate <T4>Federal Register </T4>document on capital adequacy-related regulations.The references to Federal land banks in the proposed regulation have beenreplaced with farm credit banks in the final regulation and a referenceto ACAs or merged associations has been inserted. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 618_GENERAL PROVISIONS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Releasing Information_General Comments </ITAG>In general, one comment suggested that Congress should have access to alldocuments. Another comment asserted that FCA should specify proceduresfor disclosure of information and the release of stockholder lists, includingto whom a borrower should make his request. One farm group stated thatthere should be a Systemwide policy on what information is to be released.Some comments suggested that all information used in a lender's decision-makingprocess should be disclosed. FCA does not believe that the regulations should address Congressionalaccess to such documents since Congressional requests are made pursuantto separate authority. FCA does not agree that the regulations should prescribeprocedures since System institutions are better able to establish theseprocedures. The suggestion for a Systemwide policy is unnecessary, as theregulations already specify what information is to be released to whom.In response to those comments requesting all information used during alender's decision-making process be provided, FCA assumes these commentsrefer to determinations on restructuring applications. This issue was addressedearlier in andSection; 614.4518. Section 618.8310 Lists of borrowers and stockholders. One comment suggested that the regulations should refer to the provisionsof andSection; 4.12A(b) on alternative communications. The regulations alreadyimplement these provisions in andSection; 618.8310(b)(2). One comment statedthat the following should be inserted at the end of the second sentencein andSection; 618.8310(b)(3): ``the compliance with applicable law, andefforts on behalf of borrowers and stockholders to change laws affectingthe banks and associations.'' FCA does not agree that the above-referencedlanguage should be examples of ``permissible purpose.'' Regarding ``compliancewith applicable law,'' FCA is responsible for examining an institution'scompliance with laws. Regarding the remainder of the proposed language,FCA believes that this language may encourage efforts to communicate on``social'' and ``political'' causes, or ``personal grievances'', whichare prohibited by the third sentence of andSection; 618.8310(b)(3). Section 618.8320 Data regarding borrowers and loan applicants. One commenter suggested that a borrower should be notified that informationon his loan has been submitted to a SAG. FCA is not aware of the purposewhich such a communication would serve. Thus, FCA does not believe thatthe regulation should be changed accordingly. In response, to FCCA's commentunder andSection; 614.4521 to request that language be inserted in that sectionto prohibit disclosure of information to mediators where such disclosurewould conflict with this subpart, FCA believes that as long as a borrowerdoes not object, his loan information must be provided to the mediatorpursuant to section 503 of the 1987 Act, which requires cooperation withrequests for information from mediators. The regulation has been revisedto address this issue. Section 618.8325 Disclosure of loan documents. One comment suggested that paragraph (a)(1) be revised to further define``borrower'' as ``any signatory who has a valid right of first refusalunder andSection; 614.4522.'' Another comment suggested that paragraph (b)should not be changed to include appraisals because appraisals should bepublic not privileged information. On the other hand, FCCA stated thatthe confidential nature of certain information used in an application processmust be protected. FCCA suggested that the following language be insertedfollowing the second sentence in paragraph (b): ``To the extent that anyappraisal may contain confidential information relating to or identifyingthird parties, information received by the appraiser, lender or lender'sagent under a pledge of nondisclosure, or other information of a confidentialnature, the lender shall take any action necessary and appropriate to preservethe confidentiality of such information before providing the appraisalto the borrower.'' FCA does not believe that the definition of ``borrower'' needs to be expanded.To the extent that a previous owner is also a borrower, he will have accessto his loan documents. To expand the definition may give previous ownersaccess to documents to which they should not otherwise be entitled. Regardingthe issue on appraisals, to the extent that andSection; 618.8320 affordssome protection to appraisals as confidential documents, that section isfor the benefit of the borrower, and FCA does not believe that andSection;618.8320 should be changed. Regarding FCCA's concerns, FCA agrees thatthere are valid concerns in protecting confidential third party information.However, FCA does not believe that institutions should be able to indiscriminatelywithhold <T3>any</T3> such information. To do so would effectively deny a borrowerhis right of access to the appraisal. Thus, FCA has inserted language toprotect only identifying characteristics of third parties or their propertieswhere such information is confidential. Although the lender must discloseinformation in a borrower's appraisal relating to third parties, wherethat information is confidential, the institution may withhold specificcharacteristics that would identify the third party or his property.A farm group suggested that any document relating to the loan should bemade available to the borrower. A member of Congress commented that borrowersare not being given access to all applications in violation of the law.Another commenter complained that documents are not being provided ``assoon as practical.'' Comments were received suggesting that borrowers shouldreceive copies of all documents when they are signed so that no unauthorizedchanges can be made by the lender. One commenter questioned whether allsignatories are entitled to receive copies. In response to the comment requesting disclosure of any document relatingto the loan, FCA does not agree, and believes that disclosure should belimited to documents signed or produced by the borrower. To expand thisdefinition may require lenders to disclose other business, confidentialinformation. In response to those complaints concerning lenders' compliance,the regulations clearly require compliance with the statutory requirementand no change need be made to the regulation. In response to the commentregarding timely disclosure, the regulation prescribes that the documentsshall be provided at loan execution. FCA will continue to monitor and examinefor timely compliance with statutory and regulatory requirements. In responseto the question whether all signatories are entitled to receive copies,as long as they are ``borrowers'' as defined in this section, they areentitled to receive copies. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Parts 614, 615, and 618 </ITAG>Agriculture, Banks, Banking, Credit, Foreign trade, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, Accounting, Government securities, Investments,Archives and records, Insurance, Technical assistance.For the reasons stated in the preamble, Parts 614, 615, and 618 of ChapterVI of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations are amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 614_LOAN POLICIES AND OPERATIONS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 614 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 4.12A, 4.13, 4.13B, 4.14, 4.14A, 4.14C, 4.14D,4.14E, 4.36, 4.37, 5.9, 5.17(a)(10); 12 U.S.C. 2184, 2199, 2201, 2202,2202a, 2202c, 2202d, 2202e, 2219a, 2219b, 2243, 2252(a)(10).</ITAG>2. Subparts K and L, consisting of andSection;andSection; 614.4365 through614.4368 and 614.4440 through 614.4444 are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart K_Disclosure of Loan Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4365 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4366 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4367 Required disclosures_in general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4368 Disclosure of differential interest rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart K_Disclosure of Loan Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4365</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability. </ITAG>This subpart applies only to loans from qualified lenders if the loansare not subject to the Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. 1601 <T3>et seq.</T3>). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4366</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions. </ITAG>For purposes of this subpart, the following definitions shall apply: (a) ``Adjustable rate loan'' means a loan on which the interest rate payableover the term of the loan may be changed by a qualified lender. The termincludes loans which are titled ``adjustable rate'' or ``variable rate''or any other similar designation. (b) ``Effective interest rate'' means the interest rate applicable to theloan at a point in time, adjusted to take into consideration the amountof any stock or participation certificates which the borrower must purchasepursuant to bylaw, policy or regulation in order to obtain the loan, andany loan origination charges. (c) ``Fixed rate loan'' means any loan on which the interest rate is notsubject to adjustment or variation over the term of the loan, even thoughthe effective interest rate on the loan may be so subject. (d) ``Interest rate'' means the stated contract rate of interest applicableto the loan at a point in time, excluding any charges payable by the borrowerin obtaining the loan. (e) ``Loan'' means a loan made to a farmer, rancher, or producer or harvesterof aquatic products, for any agricultural or aquatic purpose and othercredit needs of the borrower, including financing for basic processingand marketing directly related to the borrower's operations and those ofother eligible farmers, ranchers, and producers or harvesters of aquaticproducts. (f) ``Loan origination charges'' mean initial one-time transaction chargesor fees, which may or may not be computed as a percentage of the transactionamount, and which are imposed on a borrower by a qualified lender to obtaina loan, but do not include charges imposed by someone other than the lenderfor services that are not required by the lender. (g) ``Qualified lender'' means: (1) A System institution that makes loans (as defined in paragraph (e)of this section) except a bank for cooperatives; and (2) Each bank, institution, corporation, company, union, and associationdescribed in andSection; 1.7(b)(1)(B) of the Act but only with respect toloans discounted or pledged under section andSection; 1.7(b)(1) of the Act.(h) ``Standard adjustments factors'' means those financial elements, includingbut not limited to, a qualified lender's cost of funds, operating expenses,provision for loan losses, and changes in retained earnings, which aretypically taken into consideration by a qualified lender in adjusting theinterest rate on loans. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4367</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Required disclosures_in general. </ITAG>(a) Each qualified lender shall furnish the following information in writingto a prospective borrower not later than the time of the loan closing:(1) The current rate of interest on the loan; (2) In the case of an adjustable rate loan: (i) The amount and frequency by which the interest rate can be adjustedduring the term of the loan or, if there are no limitations on the amountor frequency of such adjustments, a statement to that effect; and (ii) An identification of the specific standard adjustment factors thatare taken into account in making adjustments to the interest rate on theloan; (3) The current effective interest rate on the loan with one or more representativeexamples of the impact of stock or participation certificate ownershipand applicable loan origination charges on the current interest rate computedon an annualized basis; (4) Except with respect to eligible borrower stock under section 4.9A ofthe Act, a statement indicating that stock that is purchased is at risk;(5) A statement indicating the various types of loan options availableto borrowers, with an explanation of the terms and borrower's rights thatapply to each type of loan. (b) For loans that will or may be pooled for sale on the secondary marketcreated under section 8.9 of the Act, in addition to the loan disclosurein paragraph (a) of this section, at the time of application for a loan,a qualified lender shall provide the following: (1) Notification that the loan will or may be pooled; (2) Notification that, if the loan will be pooled, the borrower will berequired to execute, within 3 days of commitment, a waiver of his rightto have the loan considered for restructuring under Title IV of the Actand 12 CFR Part 614, with a statement that rights, if any, under applicableState laws are not waived; the notification shall state that the rightsprescribed by sections 4.14, 4.14A, 4.14B, 4.14C, 4.14D and 4.36 will notapply if the loan is pooled; (3) Notification that the borrower has the right not to have his loan pooled;(4) Notification that, within 3 days of commitment, the applicant has theright to refuse to allow the loan to be pooled, thereby retaining any restructuringrights later applicable to his loan; and (5) Notification of any other terms and conditions that may apply to aloan which will or may be pooled that differ from a loan which is not pooled.(c) Each qualified lender that adjusts the interest rate on an outstandingloan shall furnish the following information in writing to the borrower:(1) The new interest rate on the loan, including the effective interestrate; (2) The date on which the new rate is effective; and (3) A statement of any factors other than standard adjustment factors whichwere taken into account in establishing the new interest rate. The noticerequired by this paragraph shall be made not later than the effective dateof a decrease in the interest rate and not later than 10 days before theeffective date of an increase in the interest rate. (d) Each qualified lender that takes any action which changes the amountof stock or participation certificates which borrowers are required toown and that modifies the effective interest rate on a loan shall furnishthe following information in writing to the borrower at least 10 days beforethe date on which such action takes effect: (1) The new effective interest rate; (2) The date on which the new rate is effective; and (3) A statement of the action(s) taken by the qualified lender that haveresulted in the new effective interest rate. (e) In the case of a loan involving more than one primary obligor, therequirements of paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section will be satisfiedby providing the disclosure to any one of such parties. <ITAG tagnum="75">Appendix to 12 CFR 614.4367_Required Disclosure Model Disclosure Forms</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following are model disclosure forms which qualified lenders mayuse to satisfy the notification requirements of section 4.13(a) of theAct and of 12 CFR 614.4367. The forms have been developed in order to givequalified lenders an idea of the type and extent of information that shouldbe contained therein. Qualified lenders are not required to follow theformat of the sample forms. Qualified lenders may develop and use otherforms provided the statements contain comparable disclosures in clear,understandable English and otherwise meet the requirements of the Act andregulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Form 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This loan is <T3>NOT </T3>subject to the Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. 1601, <T3>et seq. </T3>The following disclosure is made in accordance with section4.13(a) of the Farm Credit Act of 1971, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 2199. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">INTEREST RATE DISCLOSURE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">     (Name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">STATED INTEREST RATE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The rate of interest currently applicable to your loan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Percentage)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Borrower: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">      (Name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">EFFECTIVE INTEREST RATE \1\</ITAG><NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ This is a projection subject to change should particularloan provisions be modified during the term of the loan, such as the amountof stock or participation certificates held or the timing of repayment.For example, if the amount of stock or participation certificates heldis increased to __, the effective interest rate will be __. <ITAG tagnum="21">The stated rate of interest adjusted to take into account loan originationcharges and purchase of stock</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Percentage) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Check Applicable Box</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; This is a FIXED RATE LOAN_the stated rate of interest isnot subject to change during the life of the loan.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; This is an ADJUSTABLE RATE LOAN_the stated rate of interestis subject to change during the life of the loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If an Adjustable Rate Loan_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The interest rate on the loan may be changed <T3>(Period). </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The interest rate may be changed a maximum andplusmin; <T3>(Percentage). </T3>You will be notified 10 days prior to any increasein the effective rate or simultaneously with any decrease in the effectiverate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Standard Adjustment Factor(s) which the institution takes intoaccount in making adjustments to the interest rate is (are) <T3>(list the factors).  </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Standard Adjustment Factors may andCx.191; or may not andCx.191; bechanged during the life of the loan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Except with respect to eligible borrower stock under section 4.9Aof the Farm Credit Act of 1971, stock that is purchased in this institutionis at risk. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">See your contract documents for further information on loan termsand conditions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Should you have any questions concerning the information containedin this form please contact us at <T3>(Telephone Number). </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Form 2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This loan is not subject to the Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. 1601,<T3>et seq. </T3>The following disclosure is made in accordance with section4.13(a) of the Farm Credit Act of 1971, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 2199. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">DISCLOSURE OF A CHANGE IN THE EFFECTIVE INTEREST RATE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">     (Name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Borrower: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">      (Name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This is to inform you that on <T3>(loan and loan number),</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; The effective rate of interest will be adjusted effective<T3>(Date).</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The effective rate of interest on your loan is changed to <T3>(Percentage) </T3>from <T3>(Percentage). </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This change resulted from a:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; 1. Change in the amount of stock borrowers are required tohold in the lender to <T3>(Percentage) </T3>from <T3>(Percentage).  </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; 2. Change in the stated rate of interest on your loan effective<T3>(Date).</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The stated rate of interest on your loan changed to <T3>(Percentage) </T3>from <T3>(Percentage). </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The change was computed based on the:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; Standard adjustment factors_factors mentioned on the initialinterest rate disclosure.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; Other_describe.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">andCx.191; 3. Change for other reasons_describe.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Should you have any questions concerning the information containedherein, please contact us at <T3>(Telephone Number). </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4368</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Disclosure of differential interest rates. </ITAG>(a) A qualified lender offering more than one rate of interest to borrowersshall, at the request of a borrower:(1) Provide a review of the loan to determine if the proper interest ratehas been established; (2) Explain to the borrower in writing the basis for the interest ratecharged; and (3) Explain to the borrower in writing how the credit status of the borrowermay be improved to receive a lower interest rate on the loan. (b) A qualified lender offering more than one rate of interest as describedin paragraph (a) of this section, shall notify prospective borrowers notlater than the time of loan closing of their right to request a reviewunder paragraph (a) of this section. <ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart L_Actions on Applications; Review of Credit Decisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4440 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4441 Notice of action on loan application. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4442 Credit review committee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4443 Review process. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">614.4444 Records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart L_Actions on Applications; Review of Credit Decisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4440</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>For purposes of this subpart, the following definitions shall apply: (a) ``Adverse credit decision'' means a decision to deny the credit appliedfor, or approve an extension of credit in an amount less than the amountapplied for; to deny an application for restructuring; (b) ``Applicant'' means any person who completes and executes a formalapplication for an extension of credit from a qualified lender, or a borrowerwho completes an application for restructuring; (c) ``Application for restructuring'' means a written request_ (1) From a borrower for the restructuring of a distressed loan in accordancewith a preliminary restructuring plan proposed by the borrower as a partof the application; (2) Submitted on the appropriate forms prescribed by the qualified lender;and (3) Accompanied by sufficient financial information and repayment projections,where appropriate, as required by the qualified lender to support a soundcredit decision. (d) ``Application for a loan'' or ``loan application'' means a formal applicationfor an extension of credit from a qualified lender; (e) ``Distressed loan'' means a loan for which the borrower does not havethe financial capacity, as determined by the lender, to pay according toits terms and which exhibits one or more of the following characteristics:(1) The borrower is demonstrating adverse financial and repayment trends;(2) The loan is delinquent or past due under the terms of the loan contract;and  (3) One or both of the factors listed in paragraphs (e) (1) and (2) ofthis section, together with inadequate collateralization, present a highprobability of loss to the lender. (f) ``Loan'' means a loan made to a farmer, rancher, or producer or harvesterof aquatic products, for any agricultural or aquatic purpose and othercredit needs of the borrower, including financing for basic processingand marketing directly related to the borrower's operations and those ofother eligible farmers, ranchers, and producers or harvesters of aquaticproducts; (g) ``Qualified lender'' means: (1) A System institution that makes loans (as defined in paragraph (f)of this section) except a bank for cooperatives; and  (2) Each bank, institution, corporation, company, union, and associationdescribed in andSection; 1.7(b)(1)(B) of the Act, but only with respect toloans discounted or pledged under andSection; 1.7(b)(1). (h) ``Restructure'' and ``restructuring'' means rescheduling, reamortization,renewal, deferral of principa1 or interest, monetary concessions, or thetaking of any other action to modify the terms of, or forbear on, a loanin any way that will make it probable that the operations of the borrowerwill become financially viable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4441</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of action on loan application. </ITAG>Each qualified lender shall render its decision on a loan application inas expeditious a manner as is practicable. Upon reaching a decision ona loan application, the qualified lender shall provide prompt written noticeof its decision to the applicant. In the case of a loan application involvingmore than one primary obligor, the notice may be provided to any one ofsuch parties. Where the qualified lender makes an adverse credit decisionon a loan application, the notice shall include: (a) The specific reasons for the qualified lender's action; (b) Notification that the applicant can request a review of the decision;(c) Notification that any request for review must be made in writing within30 days after the applicant's receipt of the qualified lender's notice;and (d) A brief explanation of the process for seeking review of the decision,including the appraisal process, whom to contact at the lender for accessto the relevant information, and the right to appear before the creditreview committee. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4442</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Credit Review Committee. </ITAG>The board of directors of each qualified lender shall establish one ormore credit review committees to review adverse credit decisions made bythe lender with ultimate decision-making authority on the loan. The membershipof each committee shall include at least one member from the lender's board.In no case shall a loan officer involved in the adverse credit decisionon the loan being reviewed serve on the credit review committee when thecommittee reviews such loan. The duties of the members of the credit reviewcommittee may not be delegated to any other person, except that the creditreview committee duties of the board member may be performed from timeto time by an alternate designated by the board who shall also be a boardmember. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4443</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review Process. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Personal appearance. </T3>Each applicant or borrower who is entitledto and has requested a review may appear in person before the credit reviewcommittee. The applicant or borrower may be accompanied by counsel or byany other representative of such person's choice, to seek a reversal ofthe decision on the application under review. (b) <T3>Documentation. </T3>An applicant may submit any documents or otherevidence to support the information contained in the unsuccessful loanor restructuring application which the applicant believes will demonstratethat the loan or restructuring applied for is an eligible loan or eligiblerestructuring plan that satisfies the credit standards of the lender. (c) <T3>Independent Appraisals. </T3>An applicant for a loan, or a borrowerwho has applied for a restructuring, may, as a part of the request fora review, request an independent appraisal, by an accredited appraiser,of any interests in property securing the loan (other than the stock orparticipation certificates of the lender held by the borrower). Within30 days after a request for an appraisal, the credit review committee shallpresent the applicant or borrower with a list of three accredited appraisersapproved by the qualified lender, and the borrower shall select an appraiserfrom the list to conduct the appraisal, the cost of which shall be borneby the applicant or borrower. The lender shall provide a copy of the appraisalto the applicant or borrower, and consider the results of any such appraisalin any final determination with respect to the loan or restructuring. (d) <T3>Decision. </T3>The credit review committee shall reach a decision onthe application in its sole discretion, and such decision shall be thefinal decision of the lender. The credit review committee shall make everyreasonable effort to conduct reviews and render decisions in as expeditiousa manner as possible. Promptly after a review by the credit review committee,the committee shall notify the applicant or borrower in writing of thedecision of the committee and the reasons for the decision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4444</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Records. </ITAG>A qualified lender shall maintain a complete file of all requests for reviewsby the credit review committee, including participation in State mediationprograms, and the disposition of each review by the committee. The fileshall include minutes of each credit review committee meeting. A qualifiedlender shall also maintain sufficient materials to permit the Special AssetGroup in its district, if any, under andSection; 614.4520 to review eachdetermination not to restructure a loan and to permit the National SpecialAsset Council to review any loan for which it requests information. 3. The heading of Subpart N is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart N_Loan Servicing Requirements; State Agricultural Loan MediationPrograms; Right of First Refusal </ITAG>4. Subpart N is amended by adding a new andSection; 614.4512 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4512</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>For the purposes of this subpart, the following definitions apply: (a) ``Application for restructuring'' means a written request_ (1) From a borrower for the restructuring of a distressed loan in accordancewith a preliminary restructuring plan proposed by the borrower as a partof the application; (2) Submitted on the appropriate forms prescribed by the qualified lender;and (3) Accompanied by sufficient financial information and repayment projections,where appropriate, as required by the qualified lender to support a soundcredit decision. (b) ``Certified lender'' means a qualified lender that has been certifiedfor financial assistance under andSection; 6.4 of the Act. (c) ``Cost of foreclosure'' means: (1) The difference between the outstanding balance due as provided by theloan documents on a loan made by a qualified lender and the liquidationvalue of the loan, taking into consideration the borrower's repayment capacityand the liquidation value of the collateral used to secure the loan; (2) The estimated cost of maintaining a loan as a nonperforming asset;(3) The estimated cost of administrative and legal actions necessary toforeclose a loan and dispose of property acquired as the result of theforeclosure, including attorneys' fees and court costs; (4) The estimated cost of changes in the value of collateral used to securea loan during the period beginning on the date of the initiation of anaction to foreclose or liquidate the loan and ending on the date of thedisposition of the collateral; and (5) All other costs incurred as the result of the foreclosure or liquidationof a loan. (d) ``Distressed loan'' means a loan for which the borrower does not havethe financial capacity, as determined by the lender, to pay according toits terms and which exhibits one or more of the following characteristics:(1) The borrower is demonstrating adverse financial and repayment trends;(2) The loan is delinquent or past due under the terms of the loan contract;(3) One or both of the factors listed in paragraphs (d) (1) and (2) ofthis section, together with inadequate collateralization, present a highprobability of loss to the lender. (e) ``Foreclosure proceeding'' means: (1) A foreclosure or similar legal proceeding to enforce a lien on property,whether real or personal, that secures a nonaccrual or distressed loan;or (2) The seizing of and realizing on non-real property collateral, otherthan collateral subject to a statutory lien arising under title I or IIof the Act to effect collection of a nonaccrual or distressed loan. (f) ``Loan'' means a loan made to a farmer, rancher, or producer or harvesterof aquatic products, for any agricultural or aquatic purpose and othercredit needs of the borrower, including financing for basic processingand marketing directly related to the borrower's operations and those ofother eligible farmers, ranchers, and producers or harvesters of aquaticproducts. (g) ``Qualified lender'' means: (1) A System institution that makes loans (as defined in paragraph (f)of this section) except a bank for cooperatives; and (2) Each bank, institution, corporation, company, union, and associationdescribed in andSection; 1.7(b)(1)(B) of the Act, but only with respect toloans discounted or pledged under andSection; 1.7(b)(1) of the Act. (h) ``Restructure'' or restructuring'' means rescheduling, reamortization,renewal, deferral of principal or interest, monetary concessions, and thetaking of any other action to modify the terms of, or forbear on, a loanin any way that will make it probable that the operations of the borrowerwill become financially viable. 5. Section 614.4513 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4513</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uninsured voluntary and involuntary accounts. </ITAG>(a) Borrowers may make voluntary advance payments on their loans or, underagreement with a System institution, may make voluntary advance conditionalpayments intended to be applied to future maturities. The monies in theadvance conditional payment accounts may be available for return to theborrower in lieu of increasing his loan. System institutions may pay intereston advance conditional payments for the time the funds are held unappliedat a rate not to exceed the rate charged on the related loan(s). Systeminstitutions shall hold any advance conditional payments received in accordancewith this section in voluntary advance payment accounts. (b) System institutions may establish involuntary payment accounts including,but not limited to, funds held for the borrower, such as loan proceedsto be disbursed for which the borrower is obligated; the unapplied insuranceproceeds arising from any insured loss; and total insurance premiums andapplicable taxes collected in advance in connection with any loan. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4520</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 614.4525] </ITAG>6. Subpart O is amended by redesignating andSection; 614.4520 as andSection;614.4525. 7. Subpart N is amended by adding new andSection;andSection; 614.4514-4522to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 614.4514</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protection of borrowers who meet all loan obligations. </ITAG>(a) A qualified lender may not foreclose on any loan because of the failureof the borrower to post additional collateral, if the borrower has madeall accrued payments of principal, interest, and penalties with respectto the loan. (b) A qualified lender may not require any borrower to reduce the outstandingprincipal balance of any loan made to the borrower by any amount that exceedsthe regularly scheduled principal installment payment (when due and payable),unless: (1) The borrower sells or otherwise disposes of part or all of the collateraland the proceeds from the sale or disposition are not applied to the loan;or (2) The parties agree otherwise in a written agreement entered into bythe parties. (c) After a borrower has made all accrued payments of principal, interest,and penalties with respect to a loan made by a qualified lender, the lendershall not enforce acceleration of the borrower's repayment schedule dueto the borrower having not timely made one or more principal and/or interestpayments. (d) If a qualified lender places any loan in nonaccrual status <T3>and </T3>such action results in an adverse action being taken againstthe borrower, such as revocation of any undisbursed loan commitment, thelender shall document such change of status and promptly notify the borrowerin writing of such action and the reasons therefore. If the borrower wasnot delinquent in any principal or interest payment under the loan at thetime of such action and the borrower's request to have the loan placedback into accrual status is denied, the borrower may obtain a review ofsuch denial before the appropriate credit review committee pursuant toandSection;andSection; 614.4441 and 614.4443. The borrower must request sucha review within 30 days after receipt of the notice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4515</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Restructuring policy and reporting. </ITAG>(a) Loan restructurings are to be accomplished in accordance with: (1) The policy adopted by the bank board of directors under andSection; 4.14A(g)of the Act; (2) Any restructuring plan required by the Special Asset Group under andSection;4.14C(b)(2) of the Act, if applicable. (b) Until January 6, 1993, each qualified lender shall submit semiannualreports containing information for each 6-month period, starting from January6, 1988, to the Farm Credit Administration. The reports shall contain:(1) The results of its review of its distressed loans, conducted in orderto determine which loans are suitable for restructuring; and (2) The financial effect of loan restructurings and liquidations on thelender. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4516</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Restructuring procedures. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice. </T3>On a determination by a qualified lender that a loan madeby the lender is or has become a distressed loan, the lender shall providewritten notice to the borrower that the loan may be suitable for restructuringand that the alternative to restructuring may be foreclosure, and includewith such notice: (1) A copy of the policy of the lender established under andSection; 4.14A(g)of the Act that governs the treatment of distressed loans; and (2) All materials necessary to enable the borrower to submit an applicationfor restructuring on the loan. Such notice shall be provided not laterthan 45 days before a qualified lender begins foreclosure proceedings withrespect to any such loan outstanding to the borrower. In the case of aloan involving more than one primary obligor, the requirements of thissection will be satisfied by providing the notice to any one of such parties.(b) <T3>Opportunity for meeting. </T3>The lender shall provide any borrowerto whom a notice has been sent with a reasonable opportunity to meet personallywith a representative of the lender: (1) To review the status of the loan, the financial condition of the borrower,and the suitability of the loan for restructuring; (2) with respect toa loan that is in nonaccrual status, to develop a plan for restructuringthe loan if the loan is suitable for restructuring as determined by thequalified lender. (c) <T3>Voluntary consideration of restructuring. </T3>A qualified lender may,in the absence of an application for restructuring from a borrower, proposea restructuring plan for an individual borrower. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4517</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Restructuring decision. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Consideration of application. </T3>When a qualified lender receivesan application for restructuring from a borrower, the lender shall determinewhether or not to restructure the loan, taking into consideration: (1) Whether the cost to the lender of restructuring the loan is equal toor less than the cost of foreclosure considering all relevant factors including:(i) The present value of interest and principal foregone by the lenderin carrying out the restructuring plan; (ii) Reasonable and necessary administrative expenses involved in workingwith the borrower to finalize and implement the restructuring plan; (iii) Whether the borrower has presented a preliminary restructuring planand cash-flow analysis taking into account income from all sources to beapplied to the debt and all assets to be pledged, showing a reasonableprobability that orderly debt retirement will occur as a result of theproposed restructuring; and (iv) Whether the borrower has furnished or is willing to furnish completeand current financial statements in a form acceptable to the institution;(2) Whether the borrower is applying all income over and above necessaryand reasonable living and operating expenses to the payment of primaryobligations; (3) Whether the borrower has the financial capacity and the managementskills to protect the collateral from diversion, dissipation, or deterioration;(4) Whether the borrower is capable of working out existing financial difficulties,taking into consideration any prior restructurings on the loan, reestablishinga viable operation, and repaying the loan on a rescheduled basis; and (5) In the case of a distressed loan that is not delinquent, whether restructuringconsistent with sound lending practices may be taken to reasonably ensurethat the loan will not become a loan that it is necessary to place in nonaccrualstatus. (b) <T3>Required restructuring. </T3>If a qualified lender determines thatthe potential cost to such qualified lender of restructuring the loan inaccordance with a proposed restructuring plan is less than or equal tothe potential cost of foreclosure, the qualified lender shall restructurethe loan in accordance with the plan. If two or more restructuring alternativesare available to a qualified lender with respect to a distressed loan,the lender shall restructure the loan in conformity with the alternativethat results in the least cost to the lender. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4518</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of denial of restructuring and right to review. </ITAG>Each qualified lender shall render its decision on an application for restructuringin as expeditious a manner as is practicable. Upon reaching a decisionon a restructuring application, the lender shall provide prompt writtennotice, by certified mail or in any manner that requires a primary obligorto acknowledge receipt of the lender's decision. In the case of a loaninvolving one or more primary obligors, the notice may be provided to anyone of such parties. Where an application for restructuring is denied,the notice shall include: (a) The reason(s) for the denial, and any critical assumptions and relevantinformation upon which the reasons are based, except that any confidentialinformation shall not be disclosed; (b) Notification that the borrower may request a review of the denial;(c) Notification that any request for such review must be made in writingwithin 7 days after receiving such notice; (d) A brief explanation of the process for seeking review of the denial,including the appraisal process; and the right to appear before the creditreview committee, pursuant to andSection;andSection; 614.4442 and 614.4443accompanied by counsel or by any other representative, if the borrowerso chooses.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4519</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice before foreclosure; limitation on foreclosure. </ITAG>(a) Not later than 45 days before any qualified lender begins foreclosureproceedings with respect to a loan outstanding to any borrower, the lendershall notify the borrower that the loan may be suitable for restructuringand that the lender will review any such suitable loan for possible restructuring,and shall include with such notice a copy of the policy and the materialsdescribed in andSection; 614.4516(a)(2). The notice shall also inform theborrower that the alternative to restructuring may be foreclosure. (b) No qualified lender may foreclose or continue any foreclosure proceedingwith respect to any distressed loan before the lender has completed anypending consideration of the loan for restructuring under this subpart,and completion of credit review committee consideration, if applicable.This section shall not prevent a lender from taking any action necessaryto avoid the dissipation of assets, or the destruction, diversion or deteriorationof collateral if the lender has reasonable grounds to believe that suchdissipation, destruction, diversion or deterioration may occur. (c) Any foreclosure proceeding which is commenced by a certified lenderafter the lender's credit review committee has rejected a borrower's appealon a restructuring application must be terminated if the Special AssetGroup in its district prescribes a restructuring plan to the lender whichthe borrower accepts. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4520</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of restructurings for certified institutions; reporting. </ITAG>(a) Within 9 months after a qualified lender is certified under andSection;6.4 of the Act, such lender shall review each loan that has not been previouslyrestructured and that is in nonaccrual status on the date the lender iscertified, and shall determine whether to restructure the loan. Within6 months after a loan made by a certified lender is placed in nonaccrualstatus, the lender shall determine whether to restructure the loan. (b) Within 30 days after a qualified lender is certified to issue preferredstock under andSection; 6.27 of the Act, the board of directors of the FarmCredit Bank shall establish a Special Asset Group that shall review eachdetermination by the lender not to restructure a loan. If a Special AssetGroup determines that a loan under review should be restructured, the groupshall prescribe a restructuring plan for the loan that the qualified lendershall implement if the borrower agrees. (c) The National Special Asset Council, established by the Farm CreditSystem Assistance Board, will: (1) Under andSection; 4.14C(c) of the Act monitor compliance with the restructuringrequirements of this subpart by qualified lenders certified to issue preferredstock under andSection; 6.27 of the Act, and by Special Asset Groups establishedunder paragraph (b) of this section; and (2) Review a sample of determinations made by each special asset groupthat a loan will not be restructured. (d) With respect to determinations by a Special Asset Group that a loanwill not be restructured, the Special Asset Group shall submit to the NationalSpecial Asset Council a report evaluating the loan and the basis for thedetermination that the loan should not be restructured. (e) The National Special Asset Council will review a sufficient numberof determinations made by each Special Asset Group to foreclose on anyloan to assure the Council that such group is complying with this subpart.With regard to each determination reviewed, the Council shall make an independentjudgment on the merits of the decision to foreclose rather than restructurethe loan. (f) If the National Special Asset Council determines that any Special AssetGroup is not in substantial compliance with this subpart, the Council willnotify the group of the determination, and take such other action as theCouncil considers necessary to ensure that such group complies with thissubpart. (g) In determining whether a loan is to be restructured, each qualifiedlender certified under andSection; 6.4 of the Act, and each Special AssetGroup, shall take into consideration the factors specified in andSection;614.4517(a). The National Special Asset Council is required by statuteto consider these same factors. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4521</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Participation in state agricultural loan mediation programs. </ITAG>(a) If initiated by a borrower, System institutions shall, either concurrentlywith consideration of loan restructuring under andSection; 614.4517 or atany other appropriate time, participate in State mediation programs certifiedunder section 501 of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987, and shall presentand explore debt restructuring proposals advanced in the course of suchmediation. If provided in the certified program, System institutions mayinitiate mediation at any time. (b) System institutions shall cooperate in good faith with requests forinformation or analysis of information made in the course of mediationunder any such loan mediation program. (c) No System institution may make a loan secured by a mortgage or lienon agricultural property to a borrower on the condition that the borrowerwaive any right under the agricultural loan mediation program of any State.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 614.4522</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Right of first refusal. </ITAG>(a) For purposes of this section, in addition to the definitions in andSection;614.4512, the following definitions shall apply: (1) ``Acquired property'' means agricultural real estate acquired by aninstitution of the system as a result of a loan foreclosure or a voluntaryconveyance by a borrower who, as determined by the institution does nothave the financial resources to avoid foreclosure; (2) ``Previous owner'' means the prior record owner who was a borrowerfrom a System institution who did not have the financial resources, asdetermined by the institution, to avoid foreclosure on agricultural realestate; where the borrower is not the prior record owner, ``previous owner''means the prior record owner where that owner's land was used as collateralfor a loan to a System borrower; and (3) ``System institution'' or ``institution of the System'' means all Systeminstitutions, except banks for cooperatives. (b) Upon acquiring agricultural real estate as a result of a loan foreclosureor voluntary conveyance by a borrower, the System institution shall determinewhether the borrower had the financial resources to avoid foreclosure anddocument this determination in the file for the acquired property. (c) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this section, System institutionselecting to sell acquired property, or any portion of such real estate,of a previous owner, as defined in this section: (1) Shall notify the previous owner by certified mail, within 15 days ofthe decision to sell the property, of the appraised fair market value ofthe property as established by an accredited appraiser and of the right:(i) To purchase the property at the appraised fair market value, or (ii) To offer to purchase the property at a price less than the appraisedvalue. The notice shall inform the previous owner that any offer must bereceived within 30 days of receipt of the notification. (2) Shall accept an offer from the previous owner to purchase the propertyat the appraised value, within 15 days after the receipt of such offer,and sell the property to the previous owner, if the offer was receivedwithin 15 days of the notification required in paragraph (c)(1) of thissection. (3) Shall consider an offer from a previous owner to purchase the acquiredproperty at a price less than the appraised value, if the offer was receivedwithin 15 days of the notification required in paragraph (c)(1) of thissection. Notice of the decision to accept or reject such offer must beprovided to the previous owner within 15 days of receipt of such offer.If the institution rejects such an offer, the institution may not sellthe property to any other person: (i) At a price equal to, or less than, that offered by the previous owner;or(ii) On different terms or conditions than those that were extended tothe previous owner; without first notifying the previous owner by certifiedmail and providing an opportunity to purchase the property at such priceor under such terms and conditions. The previous owner shall have 15 days from receipt of the notificationto submit an offer to purchase at such price or under such terms and conditions.(4) For purposes of this section, financing by the System institution shallnot be considered a term or condition of the sale of acquired property.A System institution shall not be required to provide financing to theprevious owner in connection with the sale of acquired real estate. (d) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this section, System institutionselecting to lease acquired property, or any portion of such real estate,of a previous owner, as defined in this section: (1) Shall notify the previous owner by certified mail, within 15 days ofthe decision to lease, of the appraised rental value of the property, asestablished by an accredited appraiser, and of the right to: (i) Lease the property at a rate equivalent to the appraised rental valueof the property, or (ii) To offer to lease the property at rate that is less than the appraisedrental value of the property. The notice shall inform the previous owner that any offer must be receivedwithin 15 days of receipt of the notification. (2) Shall accept an offer from a previous owner to lease the property atthe appraised rental value, within 15 days after the receipt of such offer,and lease the property to the previous owner, unless the institution determinesthat the previous owner: (i) Does not have the resources available to conduct a successful farmingor ranching operation; or (ii) Cannot meet all of the payments, terms and conditions of such lease.(3) Shall consider an offer from a previous owner to lease the propertyat a rate that is less than the appraised rental value of the property.Notice of the decision to accept or reject such offer must be providedto the previous owner within 15 days of receipt of such offer. If the institutionrejects such an offer, the institution may not lease the property to anyother person: (i) At a rate equal to or less than that offered by the previous owner;or (ii) On different terms and conditions than those that were extended tothe previous owner, without first notifying the previous owner by certifiedmail and providing an opportunity to lease the property at such rate orunder such terms and conditions. The previous owner shall have 15 days after receipt of the notificationin which to agree to lease the property at such rate or under such termsand conditions. (e) System institutions electing to sell or lease acquired property ora portion thereof through a public auction, competitive bidding process,or other similar public offering: (1) Shall notify the previous owner, by certified mail, of the availabilityof such property. Such notice shall contain the minimum amount, if any,required to qualify a bid as acceptable to the institution and any termsor conditions to which such sale or lease will be subject; (2) If two or more qualified bids in the same amount are received by theinstitution, such bids are the highest received, and one of the qualifiedbids is from the previous owner, the institution shall accept the offerby the previous owner; and (3) Shall not discriminate against a previous owner. (f) Each certified mail notice requirement in this section shall be fullysatisfied by mailing one certified mail notice to the last known addressof the former borrower. (g) The rights provided under andSection; 4.36 of the Act, and this section,shall not diminish any right of first refusal under the law of the Statein which the property is located. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 615_FUNDING AND FISCAL AFFAIRS, LOAN POLICIES AND OPERATIONS,AND FUNDING OPERATIONS </ITAG>8. The authority citation for Part 615 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 4.3, 4.14B, 5.9, 5.17, 6.20, 6.26; 12 U.S.C.2154, 2202b, 2243, 2252, 2278b, 2278b-6. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Prescription, Subscription and Retirement of Stock </ITAG>9. Section 615.5290 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 615.5290</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Retirement of capital stock and participation certificates in eventof restructuring. </ITAG>(a) If a Farm Credit Bank forgives and writes off, under andSection; 614.4517,any of the principal outstanding on a loan made to any borrower, whereappropriate the Federal land bank association of which the borrower isa member and stockholder shall cancel the same dollar amount of borrowerstock held by the borrower in respect of the loan, up to the total amountof such stock, and to the extent provided for in the bylaws of the Bankrelating to its capitalization, the Farm Credit Bank shall retire an equalamount of stock owned by the Federal land bank association. (b) If a production credit association or merged association forgives andwrites off, under andSection; 614.4517, any of the principal outstandingon a loan made to any borrower, the association shall cancel the same dollaramount of borrower stock held by the borrower in respect of the loan, upto the total amount of such loan. (c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, the borrowershall be entitled to retain at least one share of stock to maintain theborrower's membership and voting interest. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 618_GENERAL PROVISIONS </ITAG>10. The authority citation for Part 618 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 4.12, 4.13A, 5.9, 5.10, 5.17; 12 U.S.C. 2183,2200, 2243, 2244, 2252. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Releasing Information </ITAG>11. Section 618.8310 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(b)(1) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 618.8310</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Lists of borrowers and stockholders. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b)(1) Within 7 days after receipt of a written request by a stockholder,each bank for cooperatives, Federal land bank association, production creditassociation, merged association, or Farm Credit Bank shall provide a currentlist of its stockholders to such requesting stockholder. As a conditionto providing the list, the bank or association may require that the stookholderagree and certify in writing that the stockholder will: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>12. Section 618.8320 is amended by adding new paragraphs (b)(9) and (b)(10)to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 618.8320</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Data regarding borrowers and loan applicants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (9) Any information relating to a loan to a borrower which has been consideredfor restructuring under andSection; 614.4517 may be provided to the DistrictSpecial Asset Group, if any, and the National Special Asset Council, uponthe request of either of these entities. (10) Any information or analysis of information requested during the courseof mediation by a State agency, governor's office or mediator under anyState mediation program certified under section 501 of the AgriculturalCredit Act of 1987, may be provided to the State agency, governor's officeor mediator, with the approval of the borrower. 13. Section 618.8325 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (b) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 618.8325</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Disclosure of loan documents. </ITAG>(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) ``Borrower'' means any signatory to a loan contract who is either primarilyor secondarily liable on such contract, including guarantors, endorsers,cosigners or the like.(2) ``Execution of the loan'' means the time at which the borrower andthe qualified lender have entered into a legal, binding, and enforceableloan contract and any subsequent amendment or modification of such contract.(3) ``Loan'' means a loan made to a farmer, rancher, or producer or harvesterof aquatic products, for any agricultural or aquatic purpose and othercredit needs of the borrower, including financing for basic processingand marketing directly related to the borrower's operations and those ofother eligible farmers, ranchers, and producers or harvesters of aquaticproducts. (4) ``Loan contract'' means any written agreement under which a qualifiedlender lends or agrees to lend funds to a borrower in consideration for,among other things, the borrower's promise to repay the loaned funds atan agreed-upon rate of interest. (5) ``Loan document'' means any form, application, agreement, contract,instrument, or other writing to which a borrower affixes his signatureor seal and which the qualified lender intends to retain in its files asevidence relating to the loan contract entered into between it and theborrower, but shall not include any document related to a loan which theborrower has not signed. (6) ``Qualified lender'' means: (i) A System institution that makes loans (as defined in paragraph (3)of this section) except a bank for cooperatives; and (ii) Each bank, institution, corporation, company, union, and associationdescribed in andSection; 1.7(b)(1)(B) of the Act, but only with respect toloans discounted or pledged under andSection; 1.7(b)(1) of the Act. (b) Each qualified lender shall provide a copy of all loan documents tothe borrower or the borrower's legal representative at the execution ofthe loan. Subsequently, upon written request of a borrower or a borrower'slegal representative, a qualified lender shall provide, as soon as practicable,a copy of any loan documents signed by the borrower, a copy of other documentsdelivered by such borrower to that qualified lender, and a copy of eachappraisal of the borrower's assets made or used by the qualified lender.To the extent that an appraisal may contain confidential third party information,the lender may protect such confidential third party information by withholdingany information that would disclose identifying characteristics of thethird party or his property. One copy shall be furnished free of charge.The lender may assess reasonable copying charges for any additional copiesrequested by the borrower. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 8, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David A. Hill, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary, Farm Credit Administration Board. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-20880 Filed 9-13-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6750-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>